  MMAALLLLAAKKHHAAMMBB  FFEEDDEERRAATTIIOONN  OOFF  IINNDDIIAA  
                                        ((RReeccooggnniizzeedd  bbyy  GGoovvtt..  ooff  IInnddiiaa  WWiiddee  LLeetttteerr  NNoo..  FF--99--44//8888//SSPP--IIII//DDaattee--0099//0022//11999966  
  
CCOODDEE  OOFF  PPOOIINNTTSS  
FFOORR    
MMAALLLLAAKKHHAAMMBB  CCOOMMPPEETTIITTIIOONNSS  
  
  
  
●●    FFoorr  BBooyyss  aanndd  GGiirrllss  
●●    FFoorr  MMeenn  aanndd  WWoommeenn  
●●    OOffffiicciiaall  NNaattiioonnaall  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  ooff  MMFFII  
●●    KKhheelloo  IInnddiiaa  YYoouutthh  GGaammeess  
●●    KKhheelloo  IInnddiiaa  UUnniivveerrssiittyy  GGaammeess  
●●    NNaattiioonnaall  GGaammeess  
●●    IInnvviittaattiioonnaall  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  
●●    NNaattiioonnaall  SScchhooooll  GGaammeess::  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  
●●    DDiissttrriicctt  aanndd  SSttaattee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  
  
                                      
                          CCOOPPYYRRIIGGHHTT::  
  
      MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  FFeeddeerraattiioonn  ooff  IInnddiiaa    
  
                                                                                EEDDIITTIIOONN  --  NNoovveemmbbeerr,,  22002222    
  
  
  
 ii 
  
LLOORRDD  HHAANNUUMMAANN  
  
  
  
 iii   
    
  
    TTHHEE  FFOOUUNNDDEERR  OOFF  MMAALLLLAAKKHHAAMMBB  
LLAATTEE  BBAALLAAMMBBHHAATTTT  DDAADDAA  
DDEEOODDHHAARR  ((11778800--11885522))  
  
  
  
 iv MMAALLLLAAKKHHAAMMBB  FFEEDDEERRAATTIIOONN  OOFF  IINNDDIIAA    
EExxeeccuuttiivvee  CCoommmmiitttteeee  
  
SS..NNoo..  NNaammee  SSttaattee  PPoosstt  
11..  SShhrrii..  DDuurrggeesshh  RRaamm  GGooaannkkaarr  GGooaa  VViiccee  PPrreessiiddeenntt  
//AAccttiinngg  PPrreessiiddeenntt  
22..  SShhrrii..  KKooddllii  SSoommaannnnaa  FFaakkkkiirraappppaa  KKaarrnnaattaakkaa  VViiccee  PPrreessiiddeenntt  
33..  SShhrrii..  SSaannjjeeeevv  SSaarraavvggii    U.P. VViiccee  PPrreessiiddeenntt 
44..  SShhrrii..  GG..PP..CC  SSeekkhhaarraa  RRaajjuu  A.P. VViiccee  PPrreessiiddeenntt 
55..  SSmmtt..  JJuuhhii  KKuummaarrii  NNaayyaakk  OOddiisshhaa  VViiccee  PPrreessiiddeenntt    
66  SShhrrii..  DDhhaarraamm  VViirr  SSiinngghh  DDeellhhii  SSeeccrreettaarryy  GGeenneerraall  
77..  SShhrrii..  KKiisshhoorrii  SShhaarraann  SShhrriivvaassttaavvaa  MM..PP..  TTrreeaassuurreerr  
88..  SShhrrii..  VViippiinn  CChhaannddrraa  PPaatthhaanniiaa  Punjab JJooiinntt  SSeeccrreettaarryy 
99..  SShhrrii..  MMoohhdd..  MMaaqqssoooodd  RRaatthheerr  J & K JJooiinntt  SSeeccrreettaarryy 
1100..  SShhrrii..  RRaavvii  PPaarriihhaarr  U.P. JJooiinntt  SSeeccrreettaarryy 
1111..  SShhrrii..  PPrraavveeeenn  KKuummaarr  MMiisshhrraa  Bihar JJooiinntt  SSeeccrreettaarryy 
1122..  SShhrrii..  SSaannggiittaa  RRaahhuull  CChhookksshhii  Gujrat JJooiinntt  SSeeccrreettaarryy 
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
AAddddrreessss  ffoorr  CCoorrrreessppoonnddeennccee  
SShhrrii  DDhhaarraamm  VViirr  SSiinngghh..  SSeeccrreettaarryy  GGeenneerraall..  
DD--22//22227711  VVaassaanntt  KKuunnjj  ,,  NNeeww  DDeellhhii  ––  111100007700    
EEmmaaiill--  mmaallllaakkhhaammbbffeeddeerraattiioonnooffiinnddiiaammffii@@ggmmaaiill..ccoomm  
MMoobbiillee..––  9988118800--0022663344,,  8877000088--7799000099  
                
 v MMAALLLLAAKKHHAAMMBB  FFEEDDEERRAATTIIOONN  OOFF  IINNDDIIAA    
  
PPRREEFFAACCEE  
  
TThhee  ffiirrsstt  ‘‘CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinnttss’’  ooff  tthhee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  FFeeddeerraattiioonn    IInnddiiaa  wwaass  ppuubblliisshheedd  iinn  tthhee  
yyeeaarr  11998800..  TThhee  ssaammee  CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinnttss’’  wwaass  ccoonnttiinnuueedd    uupp  ttoo  yyeeaarr  22001166..    TThhiiss  ccooddee  ooff  ppooiinnttss  
wwaass    ddeevveellooppeedd  iinn  aa  ggoooodd  sseennssee  ooff  eevvaalluuaattiioonn  ooff  mmaarrkkss..  HHoowweevveerr  ccoonnssiiddeerriinngg  tthhee  
ddeevveellooppmmeenntt  ooff  tthhee  ggaammee  oovveerr  tthhee    2255  yyeeaarrss..    TThhee    tteecchhnniiccaall  ccoommmmiitttteeee  ffeelltt  iitt  nneecceessssaarryy  ttoo  
rreevviissee  tthhee  CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinntt,,    wwhhiicchh  wwaass  pprreeppaarreedd  aanndd  ppuubblliisshheedd    iinn  tthhee  yyeeaarr  22000066  aanndd    
iimmpplleemmeenntteedd  ffrroomm  tthhee  yyeeaarr,,  22000077..    TThhee  tteecchhnniiccaall  ccoommmmiitttteeee  iiss  ssuurree  aanndd  ccoonnffiiddeenntt  tthhaatt  iitt  wwiillll  
mmaakkee  jjuuddggiinngg  iinn  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  vveerryy  ssiimmppllee  aanndd  ccoonnvveenniieenntt  ttoo  aallll  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittoorrss,,  ccooaacchheess  
aanndd  JJuuddggeess..    
SSiinnccee  tthhee  yyeeaarr  22000077,,    aa  lloott  ooff  nneeww  ddeevveellooppmmeennttss  ttooookk  ppllaaccee  iinn  tthhee  ffiieelldd  ooff  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb..  
TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  ffeelltt  iitt  nneecceessssaarryy  ttoo  mmaakkee  ffeeww  rreevviissiioonnss  ttoo  eennaabbllee  JJuuddggeess  ttoo  eevvaalluuaattee  tthhee  
ppeerrffoorrmmaanncceess  iinn  mmoorree  eeaassiieerr  aanndd  ttrraannssppaarreenntt  wwaayy..  AAggaaiinn,,  tthhee  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  ffeelltt  iitt  
nneecceessssaarryy  ttoo  rreevviissee  tthhee  CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinntt,,    wwhhiicchh  wwaass  pprreeppaarreedd  aanndd  ppuubblliisshheedd    iinn  tthhee  yyeeaarr  22001177..  
AAfftteerr  aapppprroovvaall  iinn  EECC    &&  AAGGMM,,  iitt  wwaass      iimmpplleemmeenntteedd    wwiitthh  iimmmmeeddiiaattee  eeffffeecctt  iinn  tthhee  NNaattiioonnaall  
mmaallllaakkhhaammbb  cchhaammppiioonnsshhiippss..    
TThhee  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  iiss  ssuurree  aanndd  ccoonnffiiddeenntt  tthhaatt  tthhiiss  ‘‘CCooddee’’  22001177  eeddiittiioonn  wwiillll  mmaakkee  
MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  mmoorree  aattttrraaccttiivvee,,  PPllaayyeerrss  OOrriieenntteedd  aanndd  ssiimmppllee  aanndd  ccoonnvveenniieenntt  ttoo  JJuuddggeess  aanndd  
CCooaacchheess  aallssoo..    IInn  tthhiiss  eeddiittiioonn,,  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  hhaavvee  aann  iinnccrreeaasseedd  tthhee  nnuummbbeerr  ooff  tteeaamm  
mmeemmbbeerrss  ffrroomm  0044  ttoo  0066  iinn  eeaacchh  aaggee  ggrroouupp..  
SSiinnccee  tthhee  yyeeaarr  22001177,,    aa  lloott  ooff  nneeww  ddeevveellooppmmeennttss  aanndd  nneeww  sskkiillllss  hhaadd    ttooookk  ppllaaccee  iinn  tthhee  
ffiieelldd  ooff  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb..  TThhee    ppoollee  mmaallllaakkhhaammbb  wwaass  iinnttrroodduucceedd  ffoorr  ggiirrllss  iinn  tthhee  yyeeaarr  22002211  dduurriinngg  
tthhee  nnaattiioonnaall  cchhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  aatt  UUjjjjaaiinn  ((MM..PP..))..    TThhee  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee    ddeecciiddeedd    ttoo  mmaakkee  
ffeeww  rreevviissiioonnss  iinn  CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinnttss    ttoo  eevvaalluuaattee  tthhee  ppeerrffoorrmmaanncceess  iinn  mmoorree  eeaassiieerr  aanndd  ttrraannssppaarreenntt  
wwaayy..    TThhee  nneeww  eeddiittiioonn  ooff  ccooddee  ooff  ppooiinnttss  wwaass  pprreeppaarreedd  aafftteerr  tthhee  3366tthh  NNaattiioonnaall  GGaammeess  aatt  
AAhheemmddaabbaadd  ((GGuujjrraatt))  aanndd  iimmpplleemmeenntteedd    ffrroomm  DDeecceemmbbeerr,,  22002222  ffoorr  tthhee  ooffffiicciiaall  nnaattiioonnaall  
cchhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  ooff  MMFFII  aanndd  uuppccoommiinngg  eevveennttss  aafftteerr  tthhee  aapppprroovvaall  ooff  mmeemmbbeerrss  ooff  EExxeeccuuttiivvee  
ccoommmmiitttteeee  tthhrroouugghh  GGooooggllee  mmeeeett  oonnlliinnee  oonn  ddaatteedd  44tthh  NNoovveemmbbeerr,,  22002222  ..    
  
CChhaaiirrmmaann  
  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  
  
  
  
 vi IINNDDEEXX  
            LLoorrdd  HHaannuummaann    PPhhoottoo……………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………                                iiii  
            FFoouunnddeerr  ooff  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………....                            iiiiii  
            LLiisstt  ooff  EExxeeccuuttiivvee  MMeemmbbeerrss…………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………                                iivv  
            PPrreeffaaccee……………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………                                vv  
              SSEECCTTIIOONN  --11  
SS..NNoo..  SSuubbjjeecctt  PPaaggee  NNoo..  
11..11  PPuurrppoossee  &&  GGooaall  0011  
11..22  BBrriieeff  HHiissttoorryy  &&  DDeevveellooppmmeenntt  0011  
11..33  TTyyppeess  ooff  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  0022  
11..44  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  0022  
11..55  JJuurryy  ooff  AAppppeeaall  0022--0033  
11..66  OOrrggaanniizziinngg  CCoommmmiitttteeee  0033  
11..77  CCoommppoossiittiioonn  aanndd  SSiittttiinngg  aarrrraannggeemmeenntt  ooff  JJuuddggeess  0033--0044  
11..88  RRuulleess  ooff  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  0044--0055  
11..99  TTeeaamm  SSttrreennggtthh    0055--0066  
11..1100  AAggee  ggrroouuppss,,  EEvveennttss  aanndd  CCoommppeettiittiioonnss  0066  
11..1111  TTyyppee  ooff  CCoommppeettiittiioonnss  0066--0088  
11..1122  TTiiee  BBrreeaakk..  0088  
11..1133  OOffffiicciiaallss  &&  tthheeiirr  DDuuttiieess    0099--1122  
11..1144  DDuuttiieess  ooff  CCoommppeettiittoorrss,,  CCooaacchheess  aanndd  MMaannaaggeerrss  1133--1144  
11..1155  MMeeddiiccaall  EExxaammiinnaattiioonn  1144  
11..1166  UUnniiffoorrmm  1144--1155  
11..1177  PPrrootteesstt  1155  
11..1188  DDiisscciipplliinnee  1155  
11..1199  MMiiggrraattiioonn  ooff  PPllaayyeerrss  aanndd  CCooaacchheess  1155--1166  
11..2200  SSoouuvveenniirr  aanndd  PPrriizzeess              1166  
11..2211  EExxaammiinnaattiioonn  ooff  JJuuddggeess  1166--1177  
11..2222  EEqquuiippmmeennttss  &&  AAcccceessssoorriieess  1177  
11..2233  EEvveennttss  ooff  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  1177--1188  
                                              SSEECCTTIIOONN  --22  
SS..  NNoo..  SSuubbjjeecctt          PPaaggee  NNoo..  
22..11  MMeetthhoodd  ooff  JJuuddggiinngg              1188  
22..22  EEvvaalluuaattiioonn  ooff  EExxeerrcciissee                1199  
22..33  DDiissttrriibbuuttiioonn  ooff  1100  PPooiinnttss            2200--  2211  
22..66  DDeedduuccttiioonnss              2222  
                        SSEECCTTIIOONN  --33          DDIIFFFFIICCUULLTTYY  TTAABBLLEE  
SS..  NNoo..  SSuubbjjeecctt                                        PPaaggee  NNoo..  
33..11  PPoollee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb                                            2233--3399  
33..22  HHaannggiinngg  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb                                    4400--4477  
33..33  RRooppee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb                                              4488--5588  
33..44  MMeeaassuurreemmeenntt                                      5599--6622  
            SECTION -4   APPENDICES   
AAPPPPEENNDDIIXX  SSuubbjjeecctt                                      PPaaggee  NNoo..  
AA  JJuuddggee’’ss  SSccoorree  SShheeeett                                          6633  
BB  JJuuddggee’’ss  SSccoorree  SSlliipp    CCoommppeettiittiioonn--II                                            6644  
CC  JJuuddggee’’ss  SSccoorree  SSlliipp    CCoommppeettiittiioonn--IIII,,  IIIIII                                                  6655 
DD  JJuuddggee’’ss  SSccoorree  SShheeeett  ffoorr  PPyyrraammiidd  CCoommppeettiittiioonn      6666 
EE  FFiinnaall  RReessuullttss  PPeerrffoorrmmaa  ffoorr  MMeenn  SSeeccttiioonn  6677 
FF  FFiinnaall  RReessuullttss  PPeerrffoorrmmaa  ffoorr  WWoommeenn  SSeeccttiioonn  6688 
GG  IInnddiivviidduuaall  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss    PPeerrffoorrmmaa  ffoorr  MMeenn  
SSeeccttiioonn  6699 
HH  IInnddiivviidduuaall  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss    PPeerrffoorrmmaa  ffoorr  
WWoommeenn    SSeeccttiioonn  7700 
 1 SECTION 1  
 
1.1     PURPOSE AND GOAL  
1.1.1 To guarantee  an  objective  and uniform evaluation of exercises in competitive 
Mallakhamb.   
11..11..22  TToo  pprroovviiddee  aa  bbaassiiss  bbyy  wwhhiicchh  eevvaalluuaattiioonn  ooff  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  ccoommppeettiittiioonnss  aatt  NNaattiioonnaall  
CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  oorr  SSeelleeccttiioonn  TTrriiaallss  aanndd  ootthheerr  rreeccooggnniizzeedd  IInnvviittaattiioonnaall  ccoommppeettiittiioonnss  
ccaann  bbee  ssttaannddaarrddiizzeedd  ssiinnccee  iitt  iiss  rreeccoommmmeennddeedd  tthhaatt  tthhiiss  CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinnttss  bbee  uuttiilliizzeedd  aatt  aallll  
NNaattiioonnaall,,  ssttaattee,,  DDiissttrriicctt  LLeevveell  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  aanndd  SSeelleeccttiioonn  TTrriiaallss..  
11..11..33  TToo  aacctt  aass  aa  gguuiiddeelliinnee  ffoorr  ccoommppeettiittoorrss  aanndd  ccooaacchheess  iinn  pprreeppaarriinngg  ffoorr  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn..  
1.1.4 To act as a Technical guideline for organizing Mallakhamb Competitions. 
. 1.2   BRIEF HISTORY AND DEVELOPMENT  
The earliest mention of Mallakhamb can be traced back to the 11th century in the form of 
sculpturer at Brihadeesarar temple built by Rajendra Chola, completed in 1035 AD. In the later 
period it is mentioned in the classic “MANASOLHAS” (1135 A.D.) For about seven centuries the art 
form remained dormant until it was given a new lease of life by BALAMBHATDADA DEODHAR 
the renowned teacher of PESHWA BAJIRAO - II during the first half of the 19th century. 
However, competitive Mallakhamb at the National level first made its appearance at the 
National Gymnastics Championships held at the Pahadganj Statium , Delhi, in the year 1958. It was 
here that the Gymnastic Federation of India proposed to recognize the game and included it in 
subsequent National Gymnastic Championships. 
The first National Mallakhamb Championship was held at Gwalior, M.P. in the year 1962, at 
part of the National Gymnastics Championships. However, in the year 1968-69 , the game was 
introduced in the All India Inter University Gymnastic Championships in an official competition of 
AIU New Delhi. They were continuously organized national mallakhamb championships  by G.F.I. 
until 1976. In 1977,  the game of Mallakhamb  was disassociated from G.F.I. and  recognized National 
Mallakhamb Championships were not held till 1980..  
Mr.Rakesh & Mr.Rajesh Shrivastava, Dr.Bamshankar Joshi and some other Mallakhamb 
enthusiasts at Ujjain, Madhya Pradesh constituted  an All India level Association on 21.11.1980, 
which was later called as the “Mallakhamb Federation of India” The first All India Invitational 
National Mallakhamb Championship was organized by this federation from 27th to 29th January 1981 
at Ujjain, Madhya Pradesh. 
The event brought in representatives from all over India, who participated In these 
Championships and together they officially formed the “Mallakhamb Federation of India” on 29th 
January 1981 to till year and date. Mallakhamb Federation was registered under society act on 07 
June, 1984 at Ujjain (MP). . Since then, the National Mallakhamb Championships are being 
organized by different State Associations Affiliated to this Federation. 
Revision of COP of MFI was done in the year 2006 and published and implemented the same 
in the year, 2007. Pole Mallakhamb for girls was introduced during national Mallakhamb 
championships held at Ujjain  in the year, 2021.  
 
 
 2 1.3     TYPES OF MALLAKHAMB 
 Mallakhamb competitions cover three varieties of Mallakhamb  Apparatus i.e. 1. Pole 
Mallakhamb, 2. Hanging Mallakhamb, 3,Rope Mallakhamb. 
1.3.1 Pole Mallakhamb 
 In this type a vertical wooden pole of Teak wood or Sheesam is fixed in the ground. The pole 
is smeared with castor oil, which helps to minimize excessive friction as the body comes in contact 
with the pole. The specification of the pole are given in Appendix 1 (A).  
1.3.2 Hanging Mallakhamb 
 This type of Mallakhamb is similar to Pole Mallakhamb, but as the name indicates, a 
wooden pole shorter in length than the standard Pole Mallakhamb, but hung with the aid of hooks and 
a chain, leaving a gap between the ground and the bottom of the Mallakhamb. The specifications of 
the Hanging Mallakhamb are given in Appendix 1 (B).  
1.3.3 Rope Mallakhamb 
 Rope Mallakhamb was previously performed on a Cane but nowadays, due to unavailability 
of a good cane, a cotton rope is used. Performers are expected to perform various exercises without 
knotting the rope in anyway. The specifications of the rope are as per Appendix 1 (C).  
1. 4.    TECHNICAL COMMITTEE 
 The Technical Committee is appointed for the smooth  technical organization of 
competitions for men and women in various age groups. The President, Secretary and Treasurer of 
MFI are the  Ex-Officio Members of this committee. The duties of the Technical Committee are as 
under : 
11..44..11  TToo  ffoorrmmuullaattee  aanndd  mmooddiiffyy  tthhee  rruulleess  ooff  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonnss  ffoorr  tthhee  ddeevveellooppmmeenntt  ooff  tthhee        
ggaammee.. 
11..44..22    TToo  ccoonndduucctt  ccoommppeettiittiioonnss  aass  ppeerr  tthhee  CCooddee    ooff    PPooiinnttss  ooff  MMFFII.. 
11..44..33    TToo  ccoonndduucctt  ttrraaiinniinngg  aanndd  aasssseessssmmeenntt  ooff  JJuuddggeess.. 
11..44..44    TToo  ccoonndduucctt  sseemmiinnaarrss  ffoorr  JJuuddggeess,,  CCooaacchheess  aanndd  CCoommppeettiittoorrss.. 
1.4.5      TToo  pprriinntt  aanndd  ppuubblliisshh  aauuddiioo--vviissuuaall  lliitteerraattuurree  oonn  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb    
11..44..66  TThhee  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  ccaann  rreeppllaaccee  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  oorr  JJuuddggeess  oorr  cchhaannggee  tthhee  
ppaanneell,,  oonn  ggrroouunnddss  ooff  iinneeffffiicciieennccyy  aanndd  //  oorr  ffoorr  ppaarrttiiaalliittyy  ,,  aafftteerr  ggiivviinngg  tthheemm  tthhee  
ooppppoorrttuunniittyy  ttoo  eexxpprreessss  tthheeiirr  vviieewwss.. 
1.4.7   TToo  aappppooiinntt  aa  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  DDiirreeccttoorr  aanndd  aa  ppaanneell  ooff  jjuuddggeess.. 
1.4.8   To form a sub-committee, if required, to execute the above. 
1.4.9   Formation of the Technical Committee must be as under: 
   (i)  Chairman, Technical Committee    01 
   (ii0  Vice Chairman Technical Committee      01 
   (iii)  Secretary,/Convener      01 
   (iii)  Members, Technical Committee     02    
1.5.    JURY OF APPEAL 
11..55..11  TThhee  EExxeeccuuttiivvee  CCoommmmiitttteeee  wwiillll  aappppooiinntt  tthhee  JJuurryy  ooff  AAppppeeaall.. 
1.5.2 The JJuurryy  ooff  AAppppeeaall    wwiillll  rreessoollvvee  tthhee  tteecchhnniiccaall  pprroobblleemmss    ffaacceedd  bbyy  tthhee  JJuuddggeess,,    
CCooaacchheess,,  OOrrggaanniizzeerr  aanndd  PPllaayyeerrss 
1.5.3 IInn  ccaassee    ooff  pprrootteesstt  rreecceeiivveedd  ,,  tthhee  DDiirreeccttoorr  ooff  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  aappppooiinntteedd  bbyy  tthhee  
MMFFII//TTeecchhnniiccaall  ccoommmmiitttteeee  wwiillll  ccoonnvveeyy  aa  mmeeeettiinngg  ooff  tthhee  JJuurryy  ooff  AAppppeeaall  ooff  
 3 ccoommppeettiittiioonn,,    wwhhiicchh  wwiillll  investigate the actual fact of affected individuals, and make 
the necessary enquires and consult  with  Chief Judge, if required and will decide  
about the protest received. The DDiirreeccttoorr  ooff  CCoommppeettiittiioonn. will convey the same to the 
concern complainant in writing.   
1.5.4 AAllll  ttyyppee  ooff  pprrootteesstt  wwiillll  hhaavvee  ttoo  bbee  ssuubbmmiitttteedd  bbyy  tthhee  ccoonncceerrnneedd  ccooaacchh  ooff  tteeaamm  iinn  
wwrriittiinngg    ttoo  tthhee  DDiirreeccttoorr  ooff  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  wwiitthhiinn  tthhee  3300  mmiinnuutteess with protest fee of Rs 
1000/- aass  eevveenntt  eennddss..  
1.5.5 Formation of Jury of Appeal of MFI 
(i) CChhaaiirrmmaann,,  TTeecchhnniiccaall..  CCoommmmiitttteeee..  IIff  CChhaaiirrmmaann  ooff  TTeecchhnniiccaall  ccoommmmiitttteeee  iiss  
aabbsseenntt,,    tthheenn  nneexxtt  sseenniioorr  mmeemmbbeerr  ooff  TTeecchhnniiccaall..  CCoommmmiitttteeee 
(ii) DDiirreeccttoorr  ooff  CCoommppeettiittiioonn   
(iii) OOnnee  rreepprreesseennttaattiivvee  ooff  MMFFII,,   
(iv) CChhaaiirrmmaann,,  JJuuddggeess  ccoommmmiitttteeee//  SSeenniioorr  mmeemmbbeerr  ooff  TTeecchhnniiccaall..  CCoommmmiitttteeee..  IIff  
CChhaaiirrmmaann  ooff  JJuuddggeess  ccoommmmiitttteeee  iiss  aabbsseenntt.. 
(v) OOrrggaanniizziinngg  SSeeccrreettaarryy  ooff  oorrggaanniizziinngg  ccoommmmiitttteeee  ooff  ccoommppeettiittiioonn..,, 
1.6     ORGANIZING COMMITTEE   
1.6.1 For planned and smooth conduction of competitions (M/W), organizing Committee 
and different sub-committees shall be formed .  
1.6.2 One representative will be appointed by the Mallakhamb Federation of India for the 
proper coordination during competition  
1.6.3 The Organizing Committee has the responsibility of preparing the ground and 
apparatus for the Competition, making lodging and boarding arrangements for the 
Competitors, Judges and Officials, planning the Opening and Closing Ceremonies, 
printing Participation Certificates for all the Teams, Judges and Officials and making 
all other necessary arrangements, for successfully conducting the Competitions. 
1.6.4 The Director, of  Competition appointed by the Mallakhamb Federation of India will 
be an ex- officio member of the Organizing Committee. 
1.7      COMPOSITION AND SITTING ARRANGEMENT OF  JUDGES  
11..77..11    FFoorr  IInnvviittaattiioonnaall  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss--  tthhee    ffoorrmmaattiioonn  ooff  ppaanneell  ooff    JJuuddggeess  oonn  eeaacchh  
aappppaarraattuuss  ccoonnssiisstteedd  ooff    
    ((ii))  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee          --    0011  ,,    
    ((iiii))  JJuuddggeess            --    0044,,    
    ((iiiiii))  TTiimmee  KKeeeeppeerr          --    0011,,      
    ((iivv))    SSccoorreerr                    --    0011..    
    ((vv))    SSeett  WWrriitteerr            __    0011  ((IIff  PPoossssiibbllee))  
11..77..22    JJuuddggeess  ppaanneell  wwiillll  ccoonnssiisstt  ooff  oonnee    JJuuddggee  ffrroomm  oonnee  ssttaattee  oonnllyy..    
11..77..33    OOnnee  SSeett  WWrriitteerr  wwiillll  bbee  aappppooiinntteedd  ttoo  wwrriittee  ddoowwnn  tthhee  sseettss  IIff  ppoossssiibbllee,,    wwiillll  ssiitt  oonn  tthhee  
rriigghhtt  ssiiddee  ooff  tthhee  SSccoorreerr..  
11..77..44  OOnn  eeaacchh  aappppaarraattuuss  tthhee  ppllaacceemmeenntt  ooff  JJuuddggeess  wwiillll  bbee  iinn  ssuucchh  aa  mmaannnneerr  tthhaatt  tthheeyy    hhaavvee  
aann  uunnoobbssttrruucctteedd  vviieeww  ooff  tthheeiirr  aappppaarraattuuss..  TThhee  SSccoorreerr  wwiillll  ssiitt  oonn  tthhee  rriigghhtt  aanndd  TTiimmee  
kkeeeeppeerr  wwiillll  ssiitt  oonn  tthhee  lleefftt  ssiiddee  ooff    tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee..    
11..77..55  IItt  iiss  ccoommppuullssoorryy  tthhaatt  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  aanndd  SSccoorreerr  mmuusstt    bbee  ffrroomm  nneeuuttrraall  SSttaattee  //  UUnniitt..  
11..77..66  The ideal seating arrangements must  be as per the diagram mentioned below: 
 4 
 
11..77..77  For Pyramid Competitions-  tthhee    ffoorrmmaattiioonn  ooff  ppaanneell  ooff    JJuuddggeess  ccoonnssiisstteedd  ooff    tthhee  
ffoolllloowwiinnggss--  
 ((ii))    CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee      --  0011      
  ((iiii))    JJuuddggeess        --  0055  
  ((iiiiii))      SSccoorreerr        --  0011    
  ((iivv))    TTiimmee  KKeeeeppeerr        --  0011      
11..77..88  TTwwoo    JJuuddggeess    ccaann  bbee  aappppooiinntteedd  ffrroomm  oonnee  ssttaattee  uunniitt  oonnllyy..    
11..77..99  The ideal seating arrangements  of the judges  must  be as per the diagram mentioned 
below: 
 
1.8 RULES FOR THE COMPETITION 
1.8.1. Registration of  Competitors 
11..88..11..11    EEaacchh  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  PPllaayyeerr  wwiillll  hhaavvee  ttoo  rreeggiisstteerr  hhiimmsseellff  ffoorr  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonnss  
tthhrroouugghh  SSttaattee  UUnniittss..  TThhee  rreeggiissttrraattiioonn  ffoorrmm,,  rreellaatteedd  iinnssttrruuccttiioonnss    aanndd    iittss  ffeeeess  
ddeettaaiill  sshhaallll  bbee  pprroovviiddeedd  bbyy  FFeeddeerraattiioonn  aanndd  ssuubbmmiitttteedd  tthhrroouugghh  aaffffiilliiaatteedd  uunniittss..    
PPllaayyeerrss    ccaann  nnoott  ppaarrttiicciippaattee  iinn  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  wwiitthhoouutt  rreeggiissttrraattiioonn..    OOnnccee  
tthhee  rreeggiissttrraattiioonn  iiss  aapppprroovveedd  bbyy  tthhee  FFeeddeerraattiioonn,,  tthhee  lliisstt  ooff  tthhee  ppllaayyeerrss  wwiillll  bbee  
pprroovviiddeedd  ttoo  tthhee  tteecchhnniiccaall  ccoommmmiitttteeee..    
11..88..11..22  TThhee  TTwwoo  PPaassssppoorrtt  ssiizzee  pphhoottooggrraapphhss  aanndd  EElliiggiibbiilliittyy  CCeerrttiiffiiccaattee  ffrroomm  tthhee  
SScchhooooll  wwiitthh  SSeeaall  ooff  tthhee  SScchhooooll  oonn  tthhee  PPhhoottooggrraapphh..  EElliiggiibbiilliittyy  CCeerrttiiffiiccaattee  
sshhoouulldd  bbee  iinn  EEnngglliisshh  llaanngguuaaggee  oonnllyy..  
11..88..11..33  FFoorr  tthhee  ppllaayyeerrss  rreeggiisstteerreedd  eeaarrlliieerr,,  SSttaattee  UUnniittss  hhaass  ttoo  mmeennttiioonn  rreeggiissttrraattiioonn  
nnuummbbeerr  wwhhiillee  ssuubbmmiittttiinngg  tthhee  eennttrryy..  
11..88..11..44  RReeggiissttrraattiioonn  FFeeeess  iiss  ttoo  bbee  ppaaiidd  aannnnuuaallllyy,,  ffoorr  ppllaayyeerrss  rreeggiisstteerreedd  eeaarrlliieerr  ,,  aanndd  
nneeww  ppllaayyeerrss..  
  
 5 1.8.2 Apparatus 
Championships will consist of the following events/apparatus :   
((ii))  FFoorr  BBooyyss  aanndd  MMeenn  --        PPoollee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  
,,              HHaannggiinngg  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  aanndd  
              RRooppee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  
(ii) For Girls and Women –  Pole MMaallllaakkhhaammbb and 
      Rope Mallakhamb     
Note: The spacing between different apparatus should be at least 10 meters . Except for 
the competitors and officials appointed for the management of the competition,  
nobody else should enter the Competition area.  
1.8.3 Age Groups  
1.8.3.1 For National Championships  Competition for Men and Women will be held in the 
following age groups 
 Category and Age Groups 
SSeexx  SSuubb--JJuunniioorr  II  SSuubb--JJuunniioorr  IIII  JJuunniioorr    SSeenniioorr    
MMeenn  UUnnddeerr  1122  YYrr  UUnnddeerr  1144  YYrr UUnnddeerr  1188  YYrr AAbboovvee  1188  YYrr 
WWoommeenn  UUnnddeerr  1122  YYrr UUnnddeerr  1144  YYrr UUnnddeerr  1188  YYrr AAbboovvee  1188  YYrr 
1.8.3.2.1 Cut - off date for all the age groups will be 31st December every year. e.g. for the 
competition conducted in the 2021-2022, 31 December, 2021 will be considered 
as cut-off date for that year, irrespective of the month in which the competitions is 
held. 
1.8.3.2.2 A player can choose to participate in his own age group or above age group. 
However, player may participate in one age group only. If the player  prefers to 
participate in  an above age group, he will not be able to participate in lower age 
group subsequently throughout his/her life.  
1.8.3.2.3 For example- Competition for the year 2021-2022,  
If a player is born on or before 31st   December, 2008, he/she will be eligible  to 
participate in Under 14 years age group.   
If a player is born on or before 1st  January 2009 or later, he/she will be eligible  to 
participate in Under 12years age group. 
1.8.3.2  For National Games  
There is no age limit for National Games organized by MFI under the auspices of 
India Olympic Association.  
1.8.3.3  For Khelo India Youth Games  
Under 18 years for boys and girls is compulsory for Khelo India Youth Games 
organized by MFI under the auspices of Sport Authority of India, New Delhi 
1.9 TEAM STRENGTH 
Each team will consist of maximum 6 players, but not less than 5 in each age group. the 
Composition of the contingent is as follows. 
 
 6 1.9.1 For National Championships 
S.No. SSeexx  UUnnddeerr  1122  YYrr  UUnnddeerr  1144  YYrr UUnnddeerr  1188  YYrr AAbboovvee  1188  YYrr TToottaall  
1 Men 06 06 06 06 24 
2 Women 06 06 06 06 24 
3 Coaches  (Men) - - - - 01 
4 Coaches (Women) - - - - 01 
5 Manager (Men) - - - - 01 
6 Manager (Women) - - - - 01 
7 General Manager  - - - - 01 
     Grand Total  53 
1.9.2 For Khelo India Youth Games  
Men  Women Coaches   
(Men) Coaches  
(Women)  Manager 
(Men)  Manager 
(Women) General 
Manager Total 
06 06 01 01 01 01 01 17 
1.9.3 For National Games  
Men  Women Coaches  (Men) Coaches (Women) Manager (Men)   Total 
06 06 01 01 01 15 
If the State participates only in one section i.e either Men or Women ,the post of 
General Manager is not valid. If number of players are 16 or less the team will be 
accompanied by only one coach / manager, each male/ female team 
Manager / Coaches shall sit in the place provided for them and they should not 
instruct / obstruct the competitors and / or the officials, during the performance of their team. 
If they do so, a Judge or the Chief Judge will ask them to leave their place and to go in to the 
spectator’s gallery. 
11..1100..  AAGGEE  GGRROOUUPPSS,,  AAPPPPAARRAATTUUSS  AANNDD  CCOOMMPPEETTIITTIIOONNSS  FFOORR  
NNAATTIIOONNAALL  CCHHAAMMPPIIOONNSSHHIIPPSS  
CCoommppeettiittiioonn  NNoo..  
AAggee  GGrroouupp  PPoollee  
OOppttiioonnaall  HHaannggiinngg  
OOppttiioonnaall  RRooppee  
OOppttiioonnaall  II  IIII  IIIIII  
UU//1122  YYeeaarrss    &&  UU//1144  YYeeaarrss  AAggee  
GGrroouupp  BBooyyss  aanndd  GGiirrllss    YYeess  NNoo  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  
UU//1188  YYeeaarrss    &&  AA//1188  YYeeaarrss  AAggee  
GGrroouupp  GGiirrllss    YYeess  NNoo  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  
UU//1188  YYeeaarrss    &&  AA//1188  YYeeaarrss  AAggee  
GGrroouupp  BBooyyss  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  YYeess  
1.11 TYPE OF COMPETITIONS 
Jn every Championship,  four Competitions will be conducted as  mentioned below--- 
((AA))  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  NNoo  ..II  ((TTeeaamm  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiipp  aanndd  QQuuaalliiffyyiinngg  RRoouunndd  ffoorr  
ccoommppeettiittiioonn  IIII    &&IIIIII  ))  
 (i) Team Championship will be decided from the Competition No. I. All the players from 
participating teams will have to  participate in this competition and  will perform optional set. 
The player who will secure an aggregate average of 60% or more marks in this competition ,   
will be qualified to participate in the next competition, It will be on  the  discretion of  
Technical Committee  who can bring down the 60% limit,  if required. 
(ii) To decide the  Team Championship,  participation of  03 complete  teams having not less than 
05 players in each team is compulsory. Out of six scores, best 05 scores of the players  on 
each apparatus   will be considered for team championship, Marks of the less than 5 players 
 7 from a state unit will not be considered for calculating Team Championship. This competition 
will also considered as a Qualifying round apart from    the Team Championship.  .The table of 
apparatus and maximum points of best 05 players   are  as under:- 
  Scores 
Sex Age Group Pole   
Event Hanging 
 Event Rope  
Event Total Score  
for TC 
BBooyyss//MMeenn  U/12 Years    50 ⅹ 50 100 
  UU//1144  YYeeaarrss     50 ⅹ 50 100 
  UU//1188  YYeeaarrss 50 50 50 150 
  AA//1188  YYeeaarrss   50 50 50 150 
GGiirrllss//WWoommeenn  U/12 Years    50 ⅹ 50 100 
 UU//1144  YYeeaarrss     50 ⅹ 50 100 
 UU//1188  YYeeaarrss 50 ⅹ 50 100 
 AA//1188  YYeeaarrss   50 ⅹ 50 100 
 (B) Competition No. II : (All Round Individual  Event Final )   
(i) This Competition decides the All Round Individual Championship collectively on all 
the apparatus in a particular age group.  
(ii) From the total scores of all the two or three apparatus, best 18 players  with qualifying 
minimum statndard of 60% marks in aggregate from competition- I,  will be qualify 
for competition II, subject to the maximum 02 players from the qualified   affiliated 
state unit.  
(iii) If the scores of the more than two competitors are from the same  state team between  
Sr. No.1 to 18, then the base scores of Competition No. I on all the apparatus will be 
consider. If Base Scores is not possible, then decision will be made by picking up by 
a Chit. 
(C) Competition No. III ( Apparatus Championship )   
TThhiiss  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  iiss  ttoo  ddeecciiddee  tthhee  CChhaammppiioonn  oonn  eeaacchh  aappppaarraattuuss..  TThhee  eeiigghhtt  bbeesstt  ppllaayyeerrss  
ffrroomm  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  NNoo..  II  oonn  eeaacchh  aappppaarraattuuss, wwiitthh  qquuaalliiffyyiinngg  ssttaannddaarrdd  ooff  6600%%  ssccoorree  
ffrroomm  ccoommppeettiittiioonn--II  oonn  tthhee  rreessppeeccttiivvee  aappppaarraattuuss  ffoorr  tthhiiss  ccoommppeettiittiioonn,,  ssuubbjjeecctt  ttoo  nnoott  
mmoorree  tthhaann  ttwwoo  ppllaayyeerrss  ffrroomm  oonnee  ssttaattee  uunniitt,,  wwiillll  bbee  ccoonnssiiddeerreedd  oonn  tthhee  rreessppeeccttiivvee  
aappppaarraattuuss..    
NNoottee  ::  IIff  dduuee  ttoo  uunnaavvooiiddaabbllee  cciirrccuummssttaanncceess  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  IIII  &&  IIIIII  ccaann’’tt  bbee  ccoonndduucctteedd,,  
JJuurryy  ooff  AAppppeeaall  mmaayy  ddeeccllaarree  tthhee  rreessuullttss  ooff  tthhee  IInnddiivviidduuaall  &&  AAppppaarraattuuss  cchhaammppiioonnsshhiipp  
ffrroomm  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  NNoo..  II  ..  
(D) Pyramid Competition :   
This competition is conducted to enhance the team moral. Minimum 6 & maximum 
12 players can participate in this competition. The competition is held on Pole 
Mallakhamb and Rope Mallakhamb for Men & Women respectively. A panel of 5 
Judges, 1 chief judge from different State Units will evaluate the Performance. From 
the five Scores, The highest and the lowest scores are deleted and an average of the 
remaining three scores will be considered as the final score. The participants should 
be only form the State Team, additional players are not allowed. 
The following terms and conditions will applied for praymid competitions, as 
mentioned below---  
 8 1. Group performance on apparatus only will be evaluated by the 05 Judge and 01 
Chief Judge. 
2. Praymid competition  will  be conducted on Pole, Hanging and Rope Mallakhamb 
for Men and Pole Mallakhamb and Rope mallakhamb for women, 
3. Total duration for  Praymid on each Appratus will be  90 Seconds only. 
4. Praymid competition will be conducted for Qualify teams with 60% score in 
Competition-I .  
5. If any Tei between teams in praymid competition, then base score will be 
calculated by adding chief judge  score  with average score of three evaluation 
judges for final score, 
6. Appointed judges on apparatus for evaluation of the performance of performer are 
not allowed  to note the score of any team, if any judge does so. will be removed 
from the judge panel by the director of Competition and Judge will be replaced  
by Chairman , Technical Committee with immediate effect 
  
11..1122      TTIIEE    BBRREEAAKK  
IInn  ccaassee  ooff  tthhee  TTiiee,,  tthhee  ffoolllloowwiinngg  rruullee  sshhoouulldd  bbee  aapppplliieedd..  
  
Tie between   2 or more players for 1st, 2nd , 3rd Position   
If there is a tie between 3 or more competitors for the third position, then  
number of difficulty elements and duration of complete set on the respective events 
will be considered This rule is applicable only if the players are from the different 
state units.  
For Example-     
Contents Player-1 Player-2 Player-3 
Evaluated Score 8.00 8..00 8.00 
Difficulty Element 16 18 17 
Duration of Set 80 Second 78 Second  82 Second  
Winner  for Bronze  x √ x 
           Note:    (i) The above  Tie rule will be  applicable only if the players  are  
competing for all round individual and apparatus championships.  
            (ii) If there is a tie between 2 or more players for the 1st, 2nd , 3rd  position 
in  all around and apparatus championships, then  number of difficulty 
elements and duration of complete set on the respective events will be 
considered to finalized the final position. This rule will be  applicable 
only if the players are from the different state units.  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 9 11....1133  OOFFFFIICCIIAALLSS  AANNDD  TTHHEEIIRR  DDUUTTIIEESS  
11..1133..11  DDiirreeccttoorr  ooff  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  
((ii))  HHee  wwiillll  bbee  aappppooiinntteedd  bbyy  tteecchhnniiccaall  ccoommmmiitttteeee  wwiitthh  tthhee  ccoonnssuullttaattiioonn  ooff  EExxeeccuuttiivvee  
ooffffiicceerr  ooff  MMFFII  aatt  lleeaasstt  oonnee  mmoonntthh  bbeeffoorree  tthhee  sscchheedduulleedd  ccoommppeettiittiioonn..  
  ((iiii))  HHee  wwiillll  cchheecckk  aallll  tthhee  ssppeecciiffiiccaattiioonn,,  ccoonnddiittiioonn//ssttaattuuss  ooff    aappppaarraattuuss,,    ppuubblliisshheedd  ssccoorree  
sshheeeettss,,  ssccoorree  sslliippss,,  aavvaaiillaabbllee  ssttoopp  WWaattcchh  aanndd  ootthheerr  ssttaattiioonnaarryy    mmaatteerriiaallss  rreellaatteedd  ttoo  
ccoommppeettiittiioonn  bbeeffoorree    aanndd  dduurriinngg  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  aalloonngg  wwiitthh  mmeemmbbeerrss  ooff  tthhee  tteecchhnniiccaall  
ccoommmmiitttteeee..    
((iiiiii))  HHee  mmaayy  iinntteerrrruupptt  iinn  pprroolloonnggeedd  ddiissccuussssiioonnss  ooff    tthhee  ppaanneell  ooff  JJuuddggeess  aanndd  tthhee  ffiinnaall  
vveerrddiicctt  ttoo    pprreevveenntt  ddeellaayy  iinn  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  &&  mmaayy  rreeffeerr  tthhee  uunnssaattiissffaaccttoorryy    eevvaalluuaattiioonn  
ppeerrffoorrmmaannccee  ooff  tthhee  jjuuddggeess  ttoo  tthhee  tteecchhnniiccaall  ccoommmmiitttteeee..    
  ((iivv))  HHee  wwiillll  cchheecckk  tthhee  ffuunnccttiioonniinngg  ooff  ppaanneell  ooff  JJuuddggeess    tthhaatt  tthhee  jjuuddggeess  aarree  ssttrriiccttllyy  
ffoolllloowwiinngg      oorr    aavvooiiddiinngg  tthhee  rruulleess    ppuubblliisshheedd  iinn  ccooddee  ooff  ppooiinnttss..    
(v) He will check that competition is going on as per scheduled time table or not. 
(vi) He will receive protest and call the meeting of Jury of Appeal and to convey the 
verdict of the jury to the concerned  persons.  
(vi)    He will check that if any near relative  of the Judge  is participating in the 
competition  as a player,  then  that judge can not act as judge  in the said 
championships.  
(vii)   He will convey the meeting of judges at least 45 minutes before the competition 
commences.  
(viii)    He will prepare the panel of judges with the consultation of Chairman of Technical 
committee. 
(ix)   He will prepare the time-Table of whole competition before in time in written form.   
1.13.2 Chief Judge  
(I) Taking into consideration experience, knowledge and merit, the         competition Director 
and chairman, technical committee combined  shall  appoint Chief Judge on each 
panel.   . 
(II) For smoother conduct of the competition, the Chief Judge must fully co-operate with 
the Competition Director and should follow the directions given by the Competition 
Director. 
(III) The Chief Judge must check all the specifications and conditions of apparatus and 
accessories, score slips, score sheets, stopwatches and other stationery related to the 
competition, before commencing his panel If there is any problem, he must report it to 
the Competition Director. 
(IV) The Chief Judge is fully responsible for the smooth and efficient conduct of his panel . 
(V) The Chief Judge should guide the Judges, Scorer, Time Keeper and Set Writer 
whenever necessary. 
(VI) When a Competitor gets ready for the performance, the Chief judge after alerting the 
panel, should signal the Competitor to ‘START’ the performance. 
 
 
 
 
 10  
(VII) After completion of the performance, before receiving the score slips from other 
Judges, the Chief Judge must prepare his own Score Slip. It is noticed that, the Chief 
Judge is not preparing this score slip before receiving the slips from the other Judges, 
it should be reported to the Competition Director. 
(VIII) After receiving the score slips from all the Judges, the Chief Judge should check the 
scores given by them, by applying appropriate rules & arrive at the final score. The 
Chief Judge should pass the slips to the scorer, along with the time taken by the 
player, average score, other deductions, if any, & the final marks, for entering the 
same on the score sheet. 
(IX) If the difference of the average of the 2 middle scores & Chief Judge exceeds the 
tolerance limit, the Chief Judge should call the concerned Judges for rectification. 
(X) If, even after a prolonged discussion, the difference does not get settled, the Chief 
Judge should report the matter to the Competition Director. 
(XI) The Chief Judge should declare the Final Score of the Player before the 
commencement of the next set. 
(XII) The Chief Judge has the right to issue a warning to any Player, Coach,  Manager, 
Judge for gross misconduct or violation of the Code. 
(XIII) After completion of the competition the Chief Judge should check the       Score Sheet 
and sign it before handing it over to the Competition Director. 
(XIV) The Chief Judge should not leave his seat, without prior permission of the 
Competition Director. 
((XXVV))  TThhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  wweeaarr  aa  uunniiffoorrmm  pprreessccrriibbeedd  bbyy  MM..FF..II..  
11..1133..33    JJuuddggeess    
((ii))    AAllll  tthhee  JJuuddggeess  sshhoouulldd  eevvaalluuaattee  tthhee  ssccoorreess  iinnddeeppeennddeennttllyy,,  ffiillll  tthhee  SSlliippss  aanndd  hhaanndd  iitt  
oovveerr  ttoo  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee,,  wwiitthhiinn  2200  SSeeccoonnddss..  
((iiii))  AA  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  nnoott  lleeaavvee  hhiiss  sseeaatt  wwiitthhoouutt  tthhee  ppeerrmmiissssiioonn  ooff  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee..  IIff  aannyy  
JJuuddggee  lleeaavveess  hhiiss  sseeaatt,,  wwiitthhoouutt  ttaakkiinngg  ssuucchh  ppeerrmmiissssiioonn,,  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  hhaass  tthhee  rriigghhtt  
ttoo  ttaakkee  aaccttiioonn  aaggaaiinnsstt  tthhaatt  JJuuddggee,,  wwiitthh  tthhee  ccoonnsseenntt  ooff  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  DDiirreeccttoorr..  
((iiiiii))  TThhee  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  rreemmaaiinn  pprreesseenntt  iinn  tthhee  aarreennaa  ttiillll  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  iiss  oovveerr,,  eevveenn  iiff,,  hhee  
mmaayy  nnoott  bbee  aaccttuuaallllyy  eevvaalluuaattiinngg  tthhee  ppeerrffoorrmmaanncceess..  
((iivv))  TThhee  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  nnoott  hhaavvee  aannyy  ccoommmmuunniiccaattiioonn  wwiitthh  tthhee  TTiimmee  KKeeeeppeerr,,  SSccoorreerr,,  
CCooaacchh,,  MMaannaaggeerr,,  ppllaayyeerrss  eettcc..  wwhhiillee  iinn  tthhee  aarreennaa..  
((vv))  IInn  ccaassee  ooff  ddoouubbtt  aabboouutt  tthhee  ddeeccllaarreedd  FFiinnaall  SSccoorree,,  tthhee  JJuuddggee  mmaayy  eexxpprreessss  hhiiss  
oobbjjeeccttiioonn  ttoo  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee,,  bbeeffoorree  tthhee  ccoommmmeenncceemmeenntt  ooff  tthhee  nneexxtt  sseett..  
((vvii))  BBeeffoorree  ssiiggnniinngg  tthhee  SSccoorree  SShheeeett,,  eevveerryy  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  cchheecckk  tthhee  SSccoorree  SShheeeett,,  wwiitthh  
rreessppeecctt  ttoo  ppooiinnttss  ggiivveenn  bbyy  hhiimm  aanndd  tthhee  ppooiinnttss  wwrriitttteenn  iinn  tthhee  SSccoorree  SShheeeett,,  AAvveerraaggee  
SSccoorree  eettcc..  IIff  aannyy  ddiissccrreeppaannccyy  iiss  nnoottiicceedd,,  tthhee  ssaammee  sshhoouulldd  bbee  bbrroouugghhtt  ttoo  tthhee  nnoottiiccee  ooff  
tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee..  
((vviiii))  IIff  aannyy  JJuuddggee  ffeeeellss  tthhaatt  hhiiss  rriigghhttss  aarree  vviioollaatteedd,,  hhee  mmaayy  aapppprrooaacchh  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  
DDiirreeccttoorr..  IInn  nnoo  ccaassee,,  hhee  iiss  aalllloowweedd  ttoo  rreeggiisstteerr  tthhee  wwrriitttteenn  pprrootteesstt..  
((vviiiiii))  TThhee  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  wweeaarr  aa  uunniiffoorrmm  pprreessccrriibbeedd  bbyy  MM..FF..II..  
  
  
 11 11..1133..  44    SSccoorreerr    
((ii))  TThhee  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  ssiitt  oonn  tthhee  rriigghhtt  ssiiddee  ooff  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee..\\  
((iiii))  TThhee  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  ccoolllleett  tthhee  rreeqquuiirreedd  ssttaattiioonneerryy,,  ppeennss,,  ssttooppwwaattcchheess,,  bbeellll  eettcc,,  bbeeffoorree  tthhee  
ccoommmmeenncceemmeenntt  ooff  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn..\\  
((iiiiii))  TThhee  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  oobbsseerrvvee  tthhee  sseeqquueennccee  ooff  tthhee  TTeeaammss  //  CCoommppeettiittoorrss..  
((iivv))  TThhee  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  hheellpp  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  bbyy  ffiilllliinngg  uupp  ooff  SSccoorreess  ggiivveenn  bbyy  tthhee  JJuuddggeess  &&  
tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee,,  wwiitthh  aaccccuurraaccyy  &&ccllaarriittyy,,  ccaallccuullaattee  tthhee  aavveerraaggee  ssccoorree,,  pprrooppeerrllyy  aappppllyy  
tthhee  ddeedduuccttiioonnss  mmaaddee  bbyy  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  aanndd  aarrrriivvee  aatt  tthhee  FFiinnaall  SSccoorree,,  aaccccoorrddiinngg  ttoo  tthhee  
rruulleess..  
((vv))  AAfftteerr  eevveerryy  tteeaamm  iiss  ffiinniisshheedd  iitt  ppeerrffoorrmmaannccee,,  tthhee  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  cchheecckk  tthhee  SSccoorree  SShheeeett,,  
ssiiggnn  iitt  hhiimmsseellff,,  &&  ttaakkee  tthhee  ssiiggnnaattuurreess  ooff  aallll  tthhee  JJuuddggeess  iinncclluuddiinngg  TTiimmee  KKeeeeppeerr  &&  CChhiieeff  
JJuuddggee  bbeeffoorree  hhaannddiinngg  oovveerr  tthhee  ssaammee  ttoo  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  DDiirreeccttoorr..  
((vvii))  TThhee  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  aattttaacchh  aallll  tthhee  SSccoorree  SSlliippss  ttoo  tthhee  rreessppeeccttiivvee  SSccoorree  SShheeeett..  
((vviiii))  AA  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  bbee  aa  qquuaalliiffiieedd  JJuuddggee  aatt  tthhaatt  lleevveell..  
((vviiiiii))  TThhee  SSccoorreerr  sshhoouulldd  wweeaarr  aa  uunniiffoorrmm  pprreessccrriibbeedd  bbyy  MM..FF..II  
11..1133..55        SSeett    WWrriitteerr    
((ii))  IItt  iiss  aaddvviisseedd  tthhaatt  iinn  eevveerryy  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  tthheerree  sshhoouulldd  bbee  aa  SSeett  WWrriitteerr  oonn  eeaacchh  ppaanneell..  IIff    
ssuuffffiicciieenntt  nnuummbbeerr  ooff  SSeett  WWrriitteerrss  aarree  nnoott  aavvaaiillaabbllee,,  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  wwiillll  rruunn  wwiitthhoouutt  
SSeett  WWrriitteerr..  
((iiii))  TThhee  SSeett  WWrriitteerr  sshhoouulldd  bbee  aa  qquuaalliiffiieedd  JJuuddggee  aatt  tthhaatt  lleevveell..  
((iiiiii))  TThhee  SSeett  WWrriitteerr  sshhoouulldd  ssiitt  oonn  tthhee  rriigghhtt  ssiiddee  ooff  tthhee  SSccoorreerr..  
((iivv))  TThhee  SSeett  WWrriitteerr  sshhoouulldd  mmaakkee  nnootteess  oonn  tthhee  sseett  iinncclluuddiinngg  mmiinnuuttee  ddeettaaiillss  ssuucchh  aass  
ppaauusseess,,  ffaauullttss,,  hheellpp,,  ffaallllss,,  ffiinnaall  bbooddyy  ppoossiittiioonnss  eettcc..  
((vv))  IInn  ccaassee  ooff  ddiiffffeerreennccee  ooff  ooppiinniioonn  bbeettwweeeenn  JJuuddggeess,,  tthhee  nnootteess  ooff  tthhee  SSeett  wwrriitteerr  sshhoouulldd  
bbee  hheelldd  aass  aann  aauutthheennttiicc  aanndd  ffiinnaall....  
((vvii))  TThhee  SSeett  WWrriitteerr  ccaann  ttaakkee  ppaarrtt  iinn  tthhee  JJuuddggeess  ddiissccuussssiioonn,,  iiff  ccaalllleedd  ffoorr  bbyy  tthhee  CChhiieeff  
JJuuddggee..  
((vviiii))  TThhee  SSeett  WWrriitteerr  sshhoouulldd  wweeaarr  aa  uunniiffoorrmm  pprreessccrriibbeedd  bbyy  MM..FF..II..  
11..1133..66      TTiimmee  KKeeeeppeerr    
((ii))  The Time keeper should sit on the left side of the Chief Judge.   
((iiii))  The Time Keeper should give maximum 3 minutes warm-up time to each team, in 
Competition No.I and 1 minute to each individual, in case     of Competition No. II and III.   
((iiiiii))  After the signal form the Chief Judge, if the Competitor fails to start his set within 10 
seconds, the Time Keeper will inform the Chief Judge.   
((iivv))  As soon as Competitor touches the apparatus, the Time Keeper will start the stopwatch 
and stop the moment player touch the ground after dismount.   
((vv))  The Time Keeper should give an short audible signal at 60 seconds by short whistle / 
bell or orally and long audible signal at 90 seconds   
((vvii))  Time signal should be clear and the competitor and his Coach should be able to hear the 
signal properly.   
((vviiii))  If an exercise / set is interrupted by a fall, the Time Keeper should not stop the 
stopwatch up to 90 seconds.   
((vviiiiii))  The Time Keeper should inform the Chief Judge, time taken by the Competitor to 
complete his set.\   
 12 ((iixx))  After every set, the Time Keeper should show the stopwatch to the Chief Judge, before 
resetting the same.   
((xx))  The Time Keeper should be a qualified Judge at that level.   
((xxii))  The Time Keeper should wear a uniform prescribed by M.F.I   
11..1133..77  SSlliipp  BBeeaarreerrss    
AAllll  tthhee  JJuuddggeess  wwiillll  pprreeppaarree  tthhee  SSccoorree  SSlliippss  aanndd  SSlliipp  BBeeaarreerrss  wwiillll  ccoolllleecctt  tthhee  sslliippss  ffrroomm  
tthhee  JJuuddggeess  aanndd  hhaanndd  tthheemm  oovveerr  ttoo  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee..  TThhee  SSlliipp  BBeeaarreerrss  sshhoouulldd  mmaaiinnttaaiinn  tthhee  
sseeccrreeccyy  ooff  tthhee  ssccoorreess  dduurriinngg  tthhee  mmoovveemmeenntt  ooff  tthhee  SSlliippss..  OOrrggaanniizzeerrss  wwiillll  pprroovviiddee  tthhee  SSlliipp  
BBeeaarreerrss  aass  wweellll  aass  wwiillll  pprroovviiddee  uunniiffoorrmm  ttoo  tthheemm..  
11..1133..88  RReeffeerreeee  
((ii)) He will be appointed by Mallakhamb Federation of India with the consultation of 
Technical Committee  formed  by  MFI and  will be called as a  field referee of 
the concerned competition. 
 (ii) Ensure that Chief Judges correctly evaluate the performance of a player on any 
Mallakhamb event during  competition  
(iii) His entire decision of the event  up to Victory ceremony will be final decision.  
(iv) He will Supervise record performance, check all the record and sign. 
(v)  He can warn and exclude the player or any judge.  
 (vi) Decide any technical points that arise during the competition including those not 
covered by the rules 
(vii) Check the competition area for their events making sure that everything is in 
order and that the competition areas are positioned with safety in mind 
  
11..1144  DDUUTTIIEESS  OOFF  CCOOMMPPEETTIITTOORRSS,,  CCOOAACCHHEESS,,    AANNDD  MMAANNAAGGEERRSS    
11..1144..11    CCoommppeettiittoorrss    
((AA))  TThhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  ccaann  ppaarrttiicciippaattee  iinn  oonnee  aaggee  ggrroouupp  oonnllyy..bb  
((BB))  TThhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  sshhoouulldd  mmaakkee  hhiimmsseellff  ffaammiilliiaarr  wwiitthh  tthhee  ccoonntteennttss  ooff  tthhee    CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinnttss..  
((CC))  TThhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  sshhoouulldd  wweeaarr  aa  pprrooppeerr  uunniiffoorrmm..  IIff  tthhee  uunniiffoorrmm  iiss  nnoott  aapppprroopprriiaattee,,  tthhee  
CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  wwiillll  mmaakkee  tthhee  ddeedduuccttiioonnss..  
((DD))  CCoottttoonn  oorr  EEllaassttiicc  ssiinnggllee  AAnnkklleett  aanndd  oorr  KKnneeee  CCaapp  ((  NNoo  FFooaamm  PPaaddddiinngg  ))  aarree  aalllloowweedd  oonn  
RRooppee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb,,  ffoorr  wwhhiicchh  nnoo  ddeedduuccttiioonnss  wwiillll  bbee  mmaaddee..  
((EE))  BBeeffoorree  tthhee  ssttaarrtt  ooff  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn,,  oonnllyy  33  mmiinnuutteess  ttoo  eeaacchh  TTeeaamm    aanndd  11  mmiinnuuttee  ttoo  eeaacchh  
IInnddiivviidduuaall  wwiillll  bbee  ggiivveenn  ffoorr  wwaarrmm  uupp..  AAfftteerr  tthhiiss  ssttiippuullaatteedd  ttiimmee  ppeerriioodd,,  TTiimmee  KKeeeeppeerr  
wwiillll  ggiivvee  tthhee  ssiiggnnaall  ttoo  ssttoopp  tthhee  wwaarrmmiinngg  uupp..  
((FF))  NNoo  wwaarrmmiinngg  uupp  iiss  aalllloowweedd  iinn  bbeettwweeeenn  ttwwoo  sseettss  ooff  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn..  FFoorr  ssuucchh  wwaarrmmiinngg  
uupp,,  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  wwiillll  mmaakkee  aapppprroopprriiaattee  ddeedduuccttiioonn..  
((GG))  TThhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  wwiillll  ggiivvee  tthhee  ssttaarrttiinngg  ssiiggnnaall  ttoo  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittoorr  aanndd  iiff  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittoorr  
ffaaiillss  ttoo  ssttaarrtt  hhiiss  //hheerr  sseett  wwiitthhiinn  1100  sseeccoonnddss,,  tthheenn  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  wwiillll  mmaakkee  aapppprroopprriiaattee  
ddeedduuccttiioonn  ffrroomm  tthhee  aavveerraaggee  ssccoorree..  
((HH))  TThhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  sshhoouulldd  nnoott  lleeaavvee  tthhee  aarreennaa  wwiitthhoouutt  tthhee  ppeerrmmiissssiioonn  ooff  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee..  
((II))  TThhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  sshhoouulldd  bbeehhaavvee  pprrooppeerrllyy  aanndd  sshhoouulldd  nnoott  ccrreeaattee  aannyy  oobbssttrruuccttiioonn  ttoo  tthhee  
ccoommppeettiittiioonn..  
  
 13   
((JJ))  TThhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  sshhoouulldd  nnoott  ddiissccuussss  aannyytthhiinngg  wwiitthh  tthhee  JJuuddggee  aabboouutt  tthhee  ppooiinnttss  ddeeccllaarreedd..  
((KK))  IInn  ccaassee  ooff  mmiissccoonndduucctt  ooff  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr,,    tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  wwiillll  mmaakkee  aapppprroopprriiaattee  
ddeedduuccttiioonnss  oonn  eevveerryy  ooccccaassiioonn  ffrroomm  tthhee  aavveerraaggee  ssccoorree..  
((LL))  IInn  ccaassee  ooff  ffaallll  ffrroomm  tthhee  aappppaarraattuuss  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  mmaayy  ccoonnttiinnuuee  hhiiss//hheerr  sseett  wwiitthhiinn  1100  
sseeccoonnddss..  DDeedduuccttiioonn  ffoorr  tthhee  eevveerryy    ffaallll  wwiillll  bbee  00..5500..    
((MM))  After the fall, if the Competitor fails to continue the set, within 10 sec. then points 
will be given for the performed set up to the fall. If the Coach enters in the arena and 
gives First Aid, after fall, no deduction will be made.  
  
11..1144..22    CCooaacchheess    
        ((ii))  TThhee  CCooaacchh  mmuusstt  hhaavvee  kknnoowwlleeddggee  ooff  tthhee  CCooddee  ooff  PPooiinnttss..  
      ((iiii))          TThhee  CCooaacchh  sshhoouulldd  aatttteenndd  tthhee  CCooaacchheess  //  MMaannaaggeerrss  MMeeeettiinngg..  
((iiiiii))  TThhee  CCooaacchh  sshhoouulldd  nnoott  ddiissccuussss  aannyytthhiinngg  aabboouutt  tthhee  eevvaalluuaattiioonn  wwiitthh  tthhee    jjuuddggeess  
((iivv))  IIff  tthhee  CCooaacchh  vviioollaatteess  rruulleess  aanndd  bbeehhaavveess  iinn  aann  uunnddiisscciipplliinneedd  mmaannnneerr,,  tthheenn  hhee  wwiillll  bbee  
wwaarrnneedd  aatt  oonnee,,  bbyy  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  aanndd  oonn  tthhee  sseeccoonndd  ssuucchh  ooccccaassiioonn,,  hhee  ccaann  bbee  
eexxppeelllleedd  ffoorrmm  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn..  
((vv))  IIff  tthhee  CCooaacchh  rreemmaaiinnss  pprreesseenntt  nneeaarr  tthhee  aappppaarraattuuss,,  wwhhiillee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  iiss  ppeerrffoorrmmiinngg  hhiiss  
sseett,,  00..2200  ppooiinnttss  wwiillll  bbee  ddeedduucctteedd  bbyy  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  ffrroomm  tthhee  aavveerraaggee  ppooiinnttss  
sseeccuurreedd  bbyy  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr..  
((vvii))  DDuurriinngg  tthhee  ppeerrffoorrmmaannccee,,  IIff  tthhee  CCooaacchh  ssiiggnnaallss  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  iinn  aannyy  ffoorrmm,,  aa  
ddeedduuccttiioonn  ooff  00..5500  ppooiinnttss  wwiillll  bbee  mmaaddee  bbyy  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee,,  ffrroomm  aavveerraaggee  SSccoorree  ooff  
tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr....  
((vviiii))  TThhee  CCooaacchh  ccaann  pprrootteesstt  iinn  wwrriittiinngg,,  aabboouutt  tthhee  ddeeccllaarreedd  ssccoorreess,,  wwiitthhiinn  tthhiirrttyy  mmiinnuutteess  
aalloonngg  wwiitthh  tthhee  pprreessccrriibbeedd  PPrrootteesstt  FFeeeess..  
((vviiiiii))  TThhee  CCooaacchh  sshhoouulldd  bbee  iinn  pprrooppeerr  uunniiffoorrmm,,  00..5500  ppooiinnttss  ddeedduuccttiioonn  wwiillll  bbee  mmaaddee  ffrroomm  
aallll  tthhee  TTeeaamm  MMeemmbbeerrss  aavveerraaggee  ssccoorree  bbyy  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee,,  iiff  tthhee  ccooaacchh  iiss  ffoouunndd  iinn  tthhee  
aarreennaa  iinn  aannyy  ootthheerr  uunniiffoorrmm....  
  
11..1144..33..    MMaannaaggeerrss    
((ii))        TThhee  MMaannaaggeerr  mmuusstt  ccoonnttrrooll  hhiiss  ffuullll  tteeaamm  aanndd  hhiiss  iiss  rreessppoonnssiibbllee  ffoorr  tthhee  bbeehhaavviioorr  ooff  hhiiss  
tteeaamm..  
((iiii))        TThhee  MMaannaaggeerr  sshhoouulldd  kkeeeepp  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittoorrss  rreeaaddyy  ffoorr  tthhee  ppeerrffoorrmmaannccee  aass  ppeerr  tthhee  
ttiimmeettaabbllee..  
((iiiiii))          TThhee  MMaannaaggeerr  sshhoouulldd  pprroodduuccee  BBiirrtthh  DDaattee  cceerrttiiffiiccaatteess  ooff  tthhee  ppllaayyeerrss  ffoorr  RReeggiissttrraattiioonn  
aalloonngg  wwiitthh  tthhee  22  pphhoottooggrraapphhss,,  ppaarrttiicciippaattiinngg  ffoorr  tthhee  11sstt  ttiimmee  aanndd  rreeggiissttrraattiioonn  nnuummbbeerrss  
ooff  ppllaayyeerrss  aallrreeaaddyy  rreeggiisstteerreedd  wwiitthh  tthhee  FFeeddeerraattiioonn..  HHee  aallssoo  hhaass  ttoo  ssuubbmmiitt  MMeeddiiccaall  
CCeerrttiiffiiccaattee  ooff  tthhee  ccoommppeettiittoorrss  oonn  ddeemmaanndd..  
((iivv))        TThhee  MMaannaaggeerr  sshhoouulldd  kknnooww  aabboouutt  tthhee  ffaacciilliittiieess  ggiivveenn  bbyy  tthhee  oorrggaanniizzeerrss  
((vv))        TThhee  MMaannaaggeerr  sshhoouulldd  aatttteenndd  tthhee  CCooaacchheess  //  MMaannaaggeerrss  mmeeeettiinngg..  
((vvii))          TThhee  MMaannaaggeerr  ccaann  pprrootteesstt  iinn  wwrriittiinngg,,  aabboouutt  tthhee  ddeeccllaarreedd  ssccoorreess,,  wwiitthhiinn  hhaallff  aann  hhoouurr  
aalloonngg  tthhee  pprreessccrriibbeedd  PPrrootteesstt  FFeeeess..  
  
  
 14 11..1155  MMEEDDIICCAALL  EEXXAAMMIINNAATTIIOONN  
MMaannaaggeerr  ooff  tthhee  SSttaattee  UUnniitt  sshhoouulldd  pprroodduuccee  tthhee  mmeeddiiccaall  cceerrttiiffiiccaattee  ssttaattiinngg  tthhee  
CCoommppeettiittoorr’’ss  ffiittnneessss  aanndd  tthhaatt  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  ddooeess  nnoott  hhaavvee  aannyy  ccoonnttaaggiioouuss  
ddiisseeaassee,,  ffoorr  eeaacchh  CCoommppeettiittoorr..  IIff,,  nneecceessssaarryy,,  tthhee  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  hhaass  tthhee  
rriigghhtt  ttoo  cchheecckk  aanndd  eexxaammiinnee  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr,,  mmeeddiiccaallllyy  &&  aallssoo  cchheecckk  tthhee  aaggee  &&  
sseexx  ooff  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr..  TThhee  TTeecchhnniiccaall  CCoommmmiitttteeee  ccaann  ccoonndduucctt  ddooppee  tteesstt  ooff  tthhee  
CCoommppeettiittoorr  aatt  aannyy  ttiimmee  bbeeffoorree,,  dduurriinngg  oorr  aafftteerr  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn..  
  
11..1166  UNIFORM    
11..1166..11  Uniform of Boys /Men Competitors   
((ii))  PPoollee  aanndd  HHaannggiinngg  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb--  TThhee  ccoommppeettiittiioonn  aattttiirree  wwiillll  bbee  LLaannggoott  aanndd  
JJaannggiiyyaa    
((iiii))  RRooppee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb--  LLaannggoott  aanndd  SShhoorrttss  wwiitthh  SSaannddoo  BBaanniiaann  oorr  TT--sshhiirrtt  oorr  
WWrreessttlliinngg  CCoossttuummee  
1.16.2       Uniform of Girls /Women Competitors   
                  ●●    RRooppee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb--  GGyymmnnaassttiicc  CCoossttuummee,,  oorr  TT--SShhiirrtt  &&  SShhoorrtt..  
1.16.3          Uniform of Men  Judges   
●●    BBllaacckk  TTrroouusseerrss  &&  WWhhiittee  sshhiirrtt  wwiitthhoouutt  aannyy  ddeessiiggnn  oorr  aannyy  ootthheerr  ccoolloouurr  
llooggooss..    
1.16.4          Uniform of Women Judges   
●●  BBllaacckk  TTrroouusseerrss  &&  WWhhiittee  sshhiirrtt//  FFuullll  WWhhiittee  SSaarreeee  aanndd  WWhhiittee  BBlloouussee  
1.16. 5          Uniform of Competition Director 
●●  BBllaacckk  TTrroouusseerrss  &&  WWhhiittee  sshhiirrtt  wwiitthhoouutt  aannyy  ddeessiiggnn  oorr  aannyy  ootthheerr  ccoolloouurr  
llooggooss..    
1.16.6         Uniform of Time Keeper,  
●●  BBllaacckk  TTrroouusseerrss  &&  WWhhiittee  sshhiirrtt  wwiitthhoouutt  aannyy  ddeessiiggnn  oorr  aannyy  ootthheerr  ccoolloouurr  
llooggooss..    
  
11..1166..77                  Uniform of Scorer 
●●  BBllaacckk  TTrroouusseerrss  &&  WWhhiittee  sshhiirrtt  wwiitthhoouutt  aannyy  ddeessiiggnn  oorr  aannyy  ootthheerr  ccoolloouurr  
llooggooss..  \\  
1.16.8          Uniform of Set Writer   
●●  BBllaacckk  TTrroouusseerrss  &&  WWhhiittee  sshhiirrtt  wwiitthhoouutt  aannyy  ddeessiiggnn  oorr  aannyy  ootthheerr  ccoolloouurr  
llooggooss..    
1.16.9          Uniform of Men and Women Coaches   
● Full Track Suit or Lower of Track Suit & T-Shirt   
1.16.10        Uniform of Slip Bearer  
● As provided by the Oragnizer  or White T-Shirt, Navy Blue Trouser 
and Sports Shoes  
11..1177              PPRROOTTEESSTT  
              ((ii))  TThhee  mmaannaaggeerr  //  CCooaacchh  ooff  tthhee  tteeaamm,,  hhaass  aa  rriigghhtt  ttoo  ffiillee  aa  pprrootteesstt  aaggaaiinnsstt  tthhee  ddeeccllaarreedd  
PPooiinnttss..  
            ((iiii))  TThhee  PPrrootteesstt  sshhoouulldd  bbee  oonn  tthhee  ooffffiicciiaall  LLeetttteerr  HHeeaadd  ooff  tthhee  rreessppeecctteedd  SSttaattee  uunniitt,,  
ssiiggnneedd  bbyy  tthhee  MMaannaaggeerr  //  CCooaacchh..  
  
 15 ((iiiiii))  TThhee  PPrrootteesstt  sshhoouulldd  bbee  aaddddrreesssseedd  ttoo  tthhee  CChhaaiirrmmaann,,  JJuurryy  ooff  AAppppeeaall..  PPrrootteesstt  ffiilleedd  
aaddddrreessssiinngg  ttoo  aannyy  ootthheerr  aauutthhoorriittyy  wwiillll  nnoott  bbee  eenntteerrttaaiinneedd..  
((iivv))  TThhee  PPrrootteesstt  sshhoouulldd  bbee  pprreesseenntteedd  wwiitthhiinn  hhaallff  aann  hhoouurr  ffrroomm  tthhee                      ddeeccllaarraattiioonn  ooff  tthhee  
ppooiinnttss..  
((vv))  TThhee  PPrrootteesstt  FFeeeess,,  RRss..11000000//--  sshhoouulldd  bbee  ddeeppoossiitteedd  iinn  ccaasshh  //OOnnlliinnee  ttrraannssffeerr  aalloonngg  
wwiitthh  tthhee  wwrriitttteenn  pprrootteesstt  iinn  tthhee  pprreessccrriibbeedd  mmaannnneerr  ttoo  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  DDiirreeccttoorr..  
((vvii))  TThhee  JJuurryy  ooff  AAppppeeaall  wwiillll  ggiivvee  tthheeiirr  ddeecciissiioonn  aabboouutt  tthhee  PPrrootteesstt,,  iinn  wwrriittiinngg,,  tthhrroouugghh  
tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  DDiirreeccttoorr..  
((vviiii))  IIff  PPrrootteesstt  iiss  uupphheelldd,,  tthhee  pprreessccrriibbeedd  PPrrootteesstt  FFeeeess  wwiillll  bbee  rreeffuunnddeedd  aanndd  iiff  nnoott,,  wwiillll  
bbee  ffoorrffeeiitteedd  &&  aa  pprrooppeerr  rreecceeiipptt  wwiillll  bbee  iissssuueedd  bbyy  tthhee  FFeeddeerraattiioonn..  
  
11..1188              DDIISSCCIIPPLLIINNEE  
DDuurriinngg  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn,,  aallll  tthhee  ppaarrttiicciippaannttss  aarree  eexxppeecctteedd  ttoo  rreessppeecctt  aallll  tthhee  
OOffffiicciiaallss  aanndd  tthheeiirr  jjuuddggmmeennttss..  FFoorr  aannyy  kkiinndd  ooff  iinnddiisscciipplliinnee  oorr  mmiiss--  ccoonndduucctt  bbyy  tthhee  
iinnddiivviidduuaall  oorr  bbyy  tthhee  tteeaamm,,  tthheeiirr  MMaannaaggeerr  aanndd  //oorr  CCooaacchh,,  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  iiss  
eemmppoowweerreedd  ttoo  ddeedduucctt  00..5500  ppooiinnttss  ffrroomm  tthhee  aavveerraaggee  ssccoorree  ooff  aann  iinnddiivviidduuaall  oorr  
tteeaamm,,  ccoonncceerrnn..  IInn  ccaassee  ooff  ggrroossss  mmiissccoonndduucctt  tthhee  CCoommppeettiittiioonn  DDiirreeccttoorr  hhaass  tthhee  
ppoowweerr  ttoo  ddiissqquuaalliiffyy  tthhee  ccoonncceerrnneedd  ppllaayyeerr  //  tteeaamm,,  oonn  tthhee  bbaassiiss  ooff  tthhee  rreeppoorrtt  ooff  tthhee  
CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  oorr  tthhee  OOffffiicciiaall..  
  
11..1199                    MMIIGGRRAATTIIOONN    
When a Competitor wants to change the State form which he / she has 
participated and registered earlier, he / she should follow the Rules of Migration. 
Reasons for Migration may be the shifting of residence. ( self / parents); starting a 
new business/shifting of business ( self / parents) & any other satisfactory reason. 
11..1199..11  MMiiggrraattiioonn  ooff    PPllaayyeerrss    
((ii))  TThhee  CCoommppeettiittoorr  sshhoouulldd  ssuubbmmiitt  aann  aapppplliiccaattiioonn  ffoorr  MMiiggrraattiioonn  ttoo  PPaarreenntt  SSttaattee  
AAssssoocciiaattiioonn  aanndd  tthhee  SSttaattee  AAssssoocciiaattiioonn  ttoo  wwhhiicchh  hhee  wwaanntt  ttoo  mmiiggrraattee  aalloonngg  wwiitthh  hhiiss  
RReeggiissttrraattiioonn  NNuummbbeerr  iissssuueedd  bbyy  FFeeddeerraattiioonn..  
((iiii))  BBootthh  tthhee  SSttaattee  UUnniittss,,  ttoo  wwhhoomm  tthhee  PPllaayyeerr  hhaass  aapppplliieedd  ffoorr  MMiiggrraattiioonn,,  sshhoouulldd  sseenndd  tthheeiirr  
rreemmaarrkkss  ttoo  tthhee  FFeeddeerraattiioonn..  
((iiiiii))  TT..CC  mmaayy  ffrroomm  aa  SSuubb--CCoommmmiitttteeee  ttoo  ttaakkee  aa  ddeecciissiioonn  oonn  tthhee  mmiiggrraattiioonn,,  wwhhiicchh  wwiillll  ssuubbmmiitt  
iittss  rreeppoorrtt  ttoo  tthhee  SSeeccrreettaarryy  ,,  MM..FF..II..  wwiitthhiinn  3300  ddaayyss..  
((iivv))          TThhee  ddeecciissiioonn  ooff  tthhee  EExxeeccuuttiivvee  CCoommmmiitttteeee  wwiillll  bbee  ffiinnaall..  
((vv))  TThhee  ffoorrmmaalliittiieess  ffoorr  MMiiggrraattiioonn  sshhoouulldd  bbee  ccoommpplleetteedd  aatt  lleeaasstt  22  mmoonntthhss  bbeeffoorree  tthhee  
NNaattiioonnaall  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss..  IIff  ,,  ffoorr  ssoommee  rreeaassoonn  MM..FF..II..  ffaaiillss  ttoo  mmaakkee  ddeecciissiioonn  oonn  tthhee  
aapppplliiccaattiioonn,,  rreeaacchheedd  wweellll  iinn  aaddvvaannccee,,  tthheenn  iitt  wwiillll  bbee  aassssuummeedd  tthhaatt  tthhee  mmiiggrraattiioonn  iiss  
ggrraanntteedd..  
((vvii))  IIff  aa  CCoommppeettiittoorr  hhaass  aallrreeaaddyy  ppaarrttiicciippaatteedd  iinn  tthhee  SSttaattee  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss,,  ooff  tthhee  PPaarreenntt  
SSttaattee,,  ccoonndduucctteedd  ffoorr  tthhee  sseelleeccttiioonn  ooff  tthhee  tteeaamm,,  ttoo  ttaakkee  ppaarrtt  iinn  tthhee  eennssuuiinngg  NNaattiioonnaall  
CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss,,  hhee  //sshhee  wwiillll  nnoott  bbee  eelliiggiibbllee  ttoo  mmiiggrraattee  ttoo  aannootthheerr  ssttaattee  iinn  tthhaatt  ccaalleennddeerr  
yyeeaarr..  
  
 16   
11..1199..22    MMiiggrraattiioonn  ooff    JJuuddggeess    
IIff  aa  jjuuddggee  wwaanntt  ttoo  mmiiggrraattee    ffrroomm  oonnee  aaffffiilliiaatteedd  ssttaattee    uunniitt  ttoo  aannootthheerr,,  tthheenn  hhee//sshhee  
sshhoouulldd  ffoollllooww  tthhee  rruulleess  ooff  MMiiggrraattiioonn..   Reasons for Migration may be the shifting of 
residence. ( self / parents); starting a new business/shifting of business ( self / parents) 
& any other satisfactory reason.   
  ((ii))  TThhee  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  ssuubbmmiitt  aann  aapppplliiccaattiioonn  ffoorr  MMiiggrraattiioonn  ttoo  PPaarreenntt  SSttaattee  AAssssoocciiaattiioonn  aanndd  
tthhee  SSttaattee  AAssssoocciiaattiioonn  ttoo  wwhhiicchh  hhee  wwaanntt  ttoo  mmiiggrraattee  aalloonngg  wwiitthh  hhiiss  RReeggiissttrraattiioonn  NNuummbbeerr  
iissssuueedd  bbyy  FFeeddeerraattiioonn..  
((iiii))  BBootthh  tthhee  SSttaattee  UUnniittss,,  ttoo  wwhhoomm  tthhee  jjuuddggee    hhaass  aapppplliieedd  ffoorr  MMiiggrraattiioonn,,  sshhoouulldd  sseenndd  tthheeiirr  
rreemmaarrkkss  ttoo  tthhee  FFeeddeerraattiioonn..  
((iiiiii))  TT..CC  mmaayy  ffrroomm  aa  SSuubb--CCoommmmiitttteeee  ttoo  ttaakkee  aa  ddeecciissiioonn  oonn  tthhee  mmiiggrraattiioonn,,  wwhhiicchh  wwiillll  ssuubbmmiitt  
iittss  rreeppoorrtt  ttoo  tthhee  SSeeccrreettaarryy  ,,  MM..FF..II..  wwiitthhiinn  3300  ddaayyss..  
((iivv))  TThhee  ddeecciissiioonn  ooff  tthhee  EExxeeccuuttiivvee  CCoommmmiitttteeee  wwiillll  bbee  ffiinnaall..  
((vviiii))  OOnnccee    tthhee  mmiiggrraattiioonn  ooff  aa  jjuuddggee  iiss  aapppprroovveedd  bbyy  tthhee  ffeeddeerraattiioonn,,  tthheenn  ssaaiidd  jjuuddggee  wwiillll  ssttaarrtt  
ttoo  wwoorrkk  aass  aa  jjuuddggee  ffrroomm  aapppprroovveedd  ssttaattee  uunniitt  aafftteerr  ppaassssiinngg  tthhee  ssttaattee  jjuuddggiinngg  eexxaamm,,  aass  
wweellll  aass  NNaattiioonnaall  jjuuddggiinngg  eexxaamm  ooff  ffeeddeerraattiioonn..    
  
11..2200          SSOOUUVVEENNIIRR  AANNDD  PPRRIIZZEESS  
((ii))  TThhee  OOrrggaanniizzeerrss  wwiillll  ggiivvee  SSoouuvveenniirr    oorr  bbaaddggeess  ttoo  aallll  tthhee    OOffffiicciiaallss  aanndd  PPaarrttiicciippaannttss,,  iiff  iitt  
iiss  ppoossssiibbllee..  
((iiii))  MMeerriitt  CCeerrttiiffiiccaatteess  aanndd  MMeeddaallss  ttoo  tthhee  wwiinnnneerrss  wwiillll  bbee    pprroovviiddeedd    bbyy  tthhee  MM..FF..II..  
((iiiiii))  IIff  aannyy  iinnssttiittuuttee  oorr  iinnddiivviidduuaall  wwiisshheess  ttoo  ddoonnaattee  aannyy    TTrroopphhiieess,,  MMeemmeennttooss,,  CCaasshh  PPrriizzee,,  
tthheenn  tthhee  ssaammee  mmuusstt  bbee  aapppprroovveedd  bbyy  tthhee  ffeeddeerraattiioonn    
((iivv))              NNoo  pprriizzeess  sshhoouulldd  bbee  ggiivveenn  oonn  tthhee  ssppoott  wwiitthhoouutt  pprriioorr  aapppprroovvaall  ooff  tthhee  MM..FF..II..  
  
11..2211            EEXXAAMMIINNAATTIIOONN  FFOORR  JJUUDDGGEESS  
MFI will conducts the national level  judging examination for the  judges under the 
following  rules. 
(i) Examinee  can appear for the examination after depositing the prescribed fees of Rs. 
2000/- to the MFI or authorized affiliated state association for conducting Judging 
examination. 
(ii) Boarding and lodging expenditure will be born by  the  candidate himself at place of 
Examination or host can arrange boarding and lodging facilities on demand and 
payment.  
(iii) Examination will be conducted in three parts of 100 Marks i.e. Theory (60 Marks), 
Practical (30 Marks) and Viva Voice (10 Marks). 
(iv) On the basis of obtained marks in Judging Examination, grades of license will be 
provided to the Examinee in the following Manner-- 
  Grade  I -  80% or above Marks 
  Grade  II -  70%  to 79%  
  Grade   III -  60%  to 69% 
 
 17   (vi) Successful candidates will get a license in the form of certificate with an Identity 
Card for the period of 04 years in which  his personal details  will be mentioned 
 (vii) The Chairman, Technical Committee will conduct the judging examination with the 
consultation of Executive officer of MFI   
 (viii)    There is no  Upper age limit of a qualified Judge. 
 
11..2222      EEQQUUIIPPMMEENNTT  &&  AACCCCEESSSSOORRIIEESS  
Before Competitions, the equipment should be approved by the M.F.I. for which one 
/ two member / s should be deputed by the M.F.I; who should visit the Competition Arena at 
least 15 days in advance, check the equipment, observe all arrangements and submit a report 
in writing to the Federation. equipments and accessories are required : 
All 3 types of Mallakhamb i.e. Pole, Hanging & 5 Rope Mallakhamb as per 
the specifications given by the Federation. 
((ii))  Mats of 2mtrs.X1mtrs.X6 to 10 cms. thick to be used around the various 
apparatus, Minimum 60 Nos. 2 Crash Mats, if available.   
((iiii))  Caster Oil (3 Liters)   
((iiiiii))  Magnesium Carbonate (Light) Powder. (5 Kg.)   
((iivv))  Resin Powder (2 Kg.)   
((vv))  Whistles / Bells (5 Nos.)   
((vvii))  5 Stop watches   
((vviiii))  Score Slips   
((vviiiiii))  Score Sheets.   
((iixx))  Score Board.   
((xx))  Stationery viz.   
((xxii))  FFoooollssccaapp  ppaappeerr  ((11RReeaamm)),,  PPaaddss,,  PPeennss  3300  NNooss..  eeaacchh,,  PPookkeerrss  55  NNooss..    
((xxiiii))  FFuurrnniittuurree  vviizz..  TTaabblleess  4400  NNooss..  CChhaaiirrss  110000  NNooss..  BBeenncchheess  1100  NNooss..  
((xxiiiiii))    
1.23  EVENTS   OF  COMPETITION  
1.Men Section 
1. Apparatus Event Final for Men on Pole Malakhamb 
2. Apparatus Event  Final for Men on Hanging Mallakhamb 
3. Apparatus Event  Final for Men  on Rope Mallakhamb 
4. Team Event Final for Men-on Pole, Hanging & Rope Mallakhamb 
5. All Round Individual Event Final for Men on combined  Score on Pole, Hanging & 
Rope Mallakhamb 
2. Women   Section  MEN 
1. Apparatus Event Final for Women on Pole Malakhamb 
2. Apparatus Event  Final for Women  on Rope Mallakhamb 
3. Team Event Final for Women on Pole, & Rope Mallakhamb 
4. All Round Individual Event Final for Women on combined Score on Pole, Hanging & 
Rope Mallakhamb 
 
 
 
 18 3. Pryamid -Men  & Women Section  
1. Pyramid Event for Men  and women on Pole Mallakhmab 
2. Pyramid Event for Men on Hanging Mallakhmab 
3. Pryamid Event for Men and women  on Rope  Mallakhmab 
 
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
 19 SSEECCTTIIOONN  22  
2.1 METHOD OF JUDGING  
2.1.1 Start of the Competition 
(i) The sequence of the performance for the teams will be decided in the  Coaches / 
Managers meeting held before the competitions.  
(ii) The  captain of the team will have  to  report to the chief judge  and  submit the  
participation sequence of the players of his team. Chief Judge will note it on 
prescribed score sheet. 
(iii) Chief Judge will allow for  warm up time of  03 minutes to get ready for the 
performance.  
(iv) Chief Judge calls the first competitor by name or number to get ready and the time 
keeper blows the whistle to start the set. As soon as the player touches the apparatus, 
the time keeper will start the stopwatch to record the time. He blows a short warning 
whistle at 60 seconds and final long whistle at 90 seconds. 
(v)  All execution Judges and chief judge  will evaluate the performer in the score slip. 
(vi) Slip bearer  will collects the score slips from execution judges and hand over 
immediately  to the scorer. Scorer will hand over the all score slips of execution 
judges  to the chief judge for consideration. If Chief judge have any doubt among the 
obtained marks of the performer from the all execution judges,  then  he can  call the 
meeting of panel of judges for discussion. After discussion, chief judge will hand over 
the all score slips  to the scorer for recording the marks in Score Sheet.  
(vii) After  recording the scores of the judges, chief Judge will declare the final score of the 
performer  on respective apparatus before start of the next performer of the team.  
(viii) If the Executive member of MFI and coach of concerned team have passed the judge 
examination, but they shall not be allowed  to act a Judge  in any Mallakhamb 
Competition. 
 
2.1.2 Calculation of Average Score 
When the panel consisted of 01 chief judge and 04 execution judges, then- The Points 
of the Chief Judge will not be considered & average of the two middle scores out of 
points awarded by the four judges will be the average score. 
 For example--- 
Panel of Judges  →→ Chief Judge  Judge 1 Judge 2 Judge 2 Judge 4 
 
Awarded points →→  
8.30 Lowest 
7.50  
7.90  
8.30 Highest 
8.40 
                     
  
2.1.3 Calculation of  Base  Score 
IIff    tthhee  ddiiffffeerreennccee  bbeettwweeeenn  tthhee  aavveerraaggee  ooff  tthhee  ttwwoo  mmiiddddllee  ssccoorree  aanndd  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  SSccoorree  hhaavvee  
mmoorree  ddiiffffeerreennccee    tthhaann  ttoolleerraannccee  lliimmiitt,,  tthheenn  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  mmuusstt  ccaattccuullaattee  tthhee    BBaassee  SSccoorree  
ttoo  ddeeccllaarree  tthhee  ffiinnaall  ssccoorree  ooff  ppeerrffoorrmmeerr    TThhee  BBaassee  SSccoorree  mmeeaannss,,  tthhee  aavveerraaggee  ooff  ttwwoo  mmiiddddllee  ,,  
SSccoorree  aanndd  ppooiinnttss  aawwaarrddeedd  bbyy  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  ddiivviiddeedd  bbyy  22..  
  
 20   
FFoorrmmuullaa  ooff  BBaassee  SSccoorree------  
AAvveerraaggee  ooff  22  mmiiddddllee  SSccoorreess  ooff  ffoouurr  jjuuddggeess  ++  SSccoorree  ooff  tthhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  
  
22  
FFoorr  EExxaammppllee::  
AAvveerraaggee  ooff  ttwwoo  mmiiddddllee  SSccoorree    iiss  99..0055  aanndd  cchhiieeff  ssccoorree  iiss  99..4400,,    tthheenn  ddiiffffeerreennccee  
bbeettwweeeenn  bbootthh  ssccoorree  iiss    99..4400  ──  99..0055    ⁼⁼    00..3355  wwhhiicchh  mmoorree  tthhaann  ttoolleerreennccee  lliimmiitt..  
TToolleerreennccee  lliimmiitt  bbeettwweeeenn  ttwwoo  ssccoorree    iiss  00..1100    ffoorr  ssccoorree  bbeettwweeeenn  99..0000  ttoo  1100..0000    ((SSeeee  
TTaabbllee  --TToolleerreennccee  LLiimmiitt))  
Panel of Judges  →→ Chief Judge Judge 1 Judge 2 Judge 2 Judge 4 
 
Awarded points →→  
9.40 Lowest 
8.90  
9.10  
9.00 Highest 
9.50 
    
 
  
22..22  EEVVAALLUUAATTIIOONN  OOFF  EEXXEERRCCIISSEE  
11..  AA  ppaanneell  ooff  aa  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  aanndd  44  JJuuddggeess  wwiillll  eevvaalluuaattee  eeaacchh  sseett,,  ffoorr  1100  ppooiinnttss,,  
iinnddeeppeennddeennttllyy..  
22..  AAfftteerr  ccoommpplleettiioonn  ooff  eeaacchh  sseett,,  eevveerryy  JJuuddggee  wwiillll  pprreeppaarree  tthhee  SSccoorree  SSlliipp                  wwiitthhiinn  2200  SSeeccoonnddss  
aanndd  hhaannddoovveerr  iitt  ttoo  tthhee  SSlliipp  BBeeaarreerr..  
33..  TThhee  CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee  sshhoouulldd  wwrriittee  ddoowwnn  hhiiss  ssccoorree  ffiirrsstt  oonn  hhiiss  sslliipp  aanndd  tthheenn  rreecceeiivvee  tthhee  SSccoorree  
SSlliippss  ffrroomm  tthhee  ootthheerr  JJuuddggeess..  
44..  TThhee  hhiigghheesstt  aanndd  tthhee  lloowweesstt  SSccoorreess  oouutt  ooff  tthhee  SSccoorreess  ggiivveenn  bbyy  tthhee  FFoouurr  JJuuddggeess  wwiillll  bbee  
cciirrcclleedd  oonn  tthhee  SSccoorree  sshheeeett  aanndd  aann  aavveerraaggee  ooff  tthhee  mmiiddddllee  ttwwoo  SSccoorreess  wwiillll  bbee  ttaakkeenn  iinn  ttoo  
ccoonnssiiddeerraattiioonn..    
55..  When the panel of judges is 4 execution Judge and  1 Chief Judge,  then the difference of 
the points between the average of the Two middle scores and the points of the Chief 
Judge should not exceed. If it is so then chief judge must calculate the base score of the 
performer to declare the final score on the respective apparatus.   
2.2.1 Tolerance limit   
Tolerance Limit of Score  between  Chief Judge  and  average of  two middle  scores of   
Judges is given  below- 
BBootthh  SSccoorree    ooff    CChhiieeff  JJuuddggee    aanndd    aavveerraaggee  ooff    ooff    
HHiigghheesstt  aanndd  lloowweesstt  SSccoorree  ttwwoo  JJuuddggee  ffaallllss  bbeettwweeeenn    DDiiffff..  bbeettwweeeenn  aavveerraaggee  ooff    ttwwoo  mmiiddddllee  
SSccoorree  aanndd  CChhiieeff  jjuuddggee  SSccoorree  
99..0000  ttoo  1100..0000  00..1100  ppooiinnttss  
88..0000  ttoo  99..0000  00..2200  ppooiinnttss  
77..0000  ttoo  88..0000  00..3300  ppooiinnttss  
66..0000  ttoo  77..0000  00..4400  ppooiinnttss  
55..0000  ttoo  66..0000  00..5500  ppooiinnttss  
    BBeellooww  55..0000  11..0000  ppooiinnttss  
 
 21 2.3. DISTRIBUTION OF 10 POINTS 
  
2.3.1 Difficulty (3.40) 
2.3.1.1 RReeqquuiirreemmeenntt  ooff  EElleemmeennttss  iinn  VVaarriioouuss  CCoommppeettiittiioonnss  
CCoommppeettiittiioonn  AA  BB  CC  
TTeeaamm  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiipp..    ((CCoommppeettiittiioonn  --II))  44    55    11    
IInnddiivviidduuaall  aallll  rroouunndd  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  
((CCoommppeettiittiioonn  --IIII))  &&  AAppppaarraattuuss  
CChhaammppiioonnsshhiipp  ((CCoommppeettiittiioonn--IIIIII  ))  11    55  22    
2.3.1.2 PPrreessccrriibbeedd  VVaalluuee  ooff  AA,,  BB,,  &&  CC    CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
AA  CCllaassss    ==  00..2200  
BB    CCllaassss      ==    00..4400  
CC  CCllaassss    ==      00..6600    
2.3.1.3 CCaallccuullaattiioonn  ooff  TToottaall  VVaalluuee  ooff    DDiiffffiiccuullttyy  iinn  VVaarriioouuss  CCoommppeettiittiioonnss  
CCoommppeettiittiioonn  AA  BB  CC  TTOOTTAALL  
TTeeaamm  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiipp..    ((CCoommppeettiittiioonn  --II))  00..2200  XX  44  ==  00..8800  00..4400  XX  55  ==  22..0000  00..6600  XX  11  ==  00..6600  33..4400  
IInnddiivviidduuaall  aallll  rroouunndd  CChhaammppiioonnsshhiippss  
((CCoommppeettiittiioonn  --IIII))  &&  AAppppaarraattuuss  
CChhaammppiioonnsshhiipp  ((CCoommppeettiittiioonn--IIIIII  ))  00..2200  XX  11  ==  00..2200  00..4400  XX  55  ==  22..0000  00..6600  XX  22  ==  11..2200  33..4400  
2.3.2 Combination (1.60)  
FFoorr  tthhee  bbaallaanncceedd  aanndd  nneeaatt  ssttrruuccttuurree  ooff  tthhee  SSeett,,  ccaarree  sshhoouulldd  bbee  ttaakkeenn  aabboouutt  tthhee  ffoolllloowwiinngg  
rreeqquuiirreemmeennttss::  
11  FFuullll  LLeennggtthh  ooff  tthhee  AAppppaarraattuuss  sshhoouulldd  bbee  uusseedd..  
22  EElleemmeennttss  sshhoouulldd  bbee  ppeerrffoorrmmeedd  bbootthh,,  ffrroomm  tthhee  rriigghhtt  aanndd  lleefftt  ssiiddeess..  
33  BBootthh,,  ffoorrwwaarrdd  aanndd  bbaacckkwwaarrdd  bbeennddiinngg  eelleemmeennttss  sshhoouulldd  bbee  ppeerrffoorrmmeedd..  
44                          AAllll    ttyyppeess  ooff      eelleemmeennttss  vviizz..        ssppeeeeddyy,,  aaccrroobbaattiicc,,  ccaattcchheess,,        hhoolldd  ppaarrttss  eettcc      ..  
sshhoouulldd  bbee        ppeerrffoorrmmeedd..  
22..33..22..11  SSppeecciiaall  ccoommbbiinnaattiioonn  rreeqquuiirreemmeennttss    oonn  PPoollee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  
S,No.  Subject Matter Penalty for Non-
execution 
1 AAllll  ppaarrttss  ooff  tthhee  PPoollee  sshhoouulldd  bbee  pprrooppeerrllyy  uuttiilliizzeedd.. 0.10 
2 One Acrobatic element of 'B' part should be executed from both sides.   0.20 
3 Continuous 3 Acrobatic elements of which at least 1 should be 'B' part   0.20 
4 AAtt  lleeaasstt  oonnee  VVeerrttiiccaall  HHoolldd  ppaarrtt.. 0.20 
5 AAtt  lleeaasstt  oonnee  HHoorriizzoonnttaall  HHoolldd  ppaarrtt..  0.20 
6 One Hold position demonstrating flexibility of back bone.   0.10 
7 AAtt  lleeaasstt  BB  mmoouunntt.. 0.10 
8 At least C dismount.   0.20 
9 At least two transitions from one hold position to another Hold position.   0.20 
10 Minimum 16 elements in one Set.   0.10 DDiiffffiiccuullttyy  33..4400  PPooiinnttss  
CCoommbbiinnaattiioonn  11..6600  PPooiinnttss  
EExxeeccuuttiioonn  44..8800  PPooiinnttss  
BBoonnuuss  FFoorr  OOrriiggiinnaalliittyy  00..2200  PPooiinnttss  
TToottaall  1100..0000  PPooiinnttss  
 22   
22..33..22..22  SSppeecciiaall  ccoommbbiinnaattiioonn  rreeqquuiirreemmeennttss    oonn  HHaannggiinngg    MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  
S,No.  Subject Matter Penalty for Non-
execution 
1 AAllll  ppaarrttss  ooff  tthhee  PPOOLLEE  MMAALLLLAAKKHHAAMMBB    sshhoouulldd  bbee  pprrooppeerrllyy  uuttiilliizzeedd.. 0.10 
2 One Acrobatic element of 'B' part should be executed from both sides.   0.20 
3 Continuous 3 Acrobatic elements of which at least 1 should be 'B' part   0.20 
4 AAtt  lleeaasstt  oonnee  VVeerrttiiccaall  HHoolldd  ppaarrtt.. 0.20 
5 AAtt  lleeaasstt  oonnee  HHoorriizzoonnttaall  HHoolldd  ppaarrtt..  0.20 
6 One Hold position demonstrating flexibility of back bone.   0.10 
7 AAtt  lleeaasstt  BB  mmoouunntt.. 0.10 
8 At least C dismount.   0.20 
9 At least two transitions from one hold position to another Hold 
position.  0.20 
10 Minimum 14 elements in one Set.   0.10 
22..33..22..33  SSppeecciiaall  ccoommbbiinnaattiioonn  rreeqquuiirreemmeennttss    oonn  RRooppee  MMaallllaakkhhaammbb  
S,No.  Subject Matter Penalty for Non-
execution 
1 AAllll  ppaarrttss  ooff  tthhee  RROOPPEE  MMAALLLLAAKKHHAAMMBB  sshhoouulldd  bbee  pprrooppeerrllyy  uuttiilliizzeedd.. 0.10 
2 One Acrobatic element of 'B' part Must be execute.   0.20 
3 AAtt  LLeeaasstt  oonnccee  tthhee  RROOPPEE  MMuusstt  bbee  hheelldd  iinn  lleeggss  aatt  44  mmttrr  hheeiigghhtt  0.20 
4 AAtt  lleeaasstt  oonnee  VVeerrttiiccaall  HHoolldd  ppaarrtt.. 0.20 
5 AAtt  lleeaasstt  oonnee  HHoorriizzoonnttaall  HHoolldd  ppaarrtt..  0.20 
6 One Hold position   0.10 
7 AAtt  lleeaasstt  BB  mmoouunntt.. Minimum 18 elements in one Set. 0.10 
8 AAtt  lleeaasstt  CC  DDiiss  mmoouunntt..  0.20 
9 Demonstrating flexibility of back bone.   0.10 
10 At least one Strength 0.20 
 
2.3.3 Execution (4.80 Points) 
Execution includes - 
1.  Technique. 
2.  Maximum range of movements ( Amplitude ) 
3.  Proper posture. 
4.  Controlled body movements. 
5.  Exactness of phases during turning movements. 
6.  Height and flight / amplitude of the catches. 
7.  Proper position and proper direction after ‘zaap’ (Catch) 
8.  Dismount with steady and perfect landing. 
9.  Preciseness in whole performance. 
10.  Speed of the set. 
2.3.4 Bonus (0.20 Points) 
For invention of new elements by the coaches and players,  0.60 bonus points are allotted to 
the players. Distributed of Bonus points will be 0.20 for Original element. The coach should submit 
his newly invented element with the name and description to the technical committee  for  approval. 
The said element will be treated as `Originality’ for next 365 days and if executed at the competitions 
 23 2.4  DEDUCTIONS  
2.4.1  Minor Deductions  from Execution 
S.No. Subject Matter Deductions 
1 Improper Body Posture.  0.10 
2 Not stretched palms and legs  0.10 
3 Bending the palms/elbows/knees  0.10 
4 Unnecessary separation of hands and leg  0.10 
5 Improper final position.  0.10 
6 Improper final position.  0.10 
7 Unessential pause for more than 2 Seconds  0.10 
8 Unnecessary touches to the Apparatus.  0.10 
9 Low height and flight at mounts and dismounts  0.10 
10 Technically improper turning movements.  0.10 
11 . Low Amplitude  0.10 
12 Slight touch of hands or legs to the ground/mats  Up to 0.20  
13 Extra swing where not required.  Up to 0.20  
14 Improper/Slipped Catches.  Up to 0.20  
15 Too low height and flight at mount and dismounts  Up to 0.20  
16 Tuck, pike or hollow, where not required.  Up to 0.20  
17 Unnecessary break in the continuity of elements  Up to 0.20  
2.4.2 Major Deductions from Execution 
S.No. Subject Matter Deductions 
1 Losing the balance on the apparatus itself.  up to 0.50  
2 Physically help by the Coach.  up to 0.50  
3 Fall on the Ground  up to 0.50  
2.4.3 Deductions From  Final Score by the Chief Judge  
The Chief Judge will make deductions, from the Average Score of the Judges. Deductions by 
the Chief Judge will be shown in the deductions column of the Score Sheet. 
S.No. Subject Matter Deductions 
1 For not reporting to the Chief Judge before & after the Set  0.10 
2 For not maintaining the Sequence  0.20 
3 For exceeding the warm up period  0.20 
4 For warming up between 2 optional sets without permission  0.20 
5 Set not started within 10 seconds from the start’ signal  0.20 
6 For improper attire  0.20 
7 If the Team is not in Uniform (Deduction from Team Total)  0.50 
8 Time Deduction: As per the prescribed Table  - 
9 For misbehaviour of the Competitor  1.00 
10 For gross misconduct debarring the Individual or Team  0.10 
2.4.4 Time Deductions  from Final score  
S. No. Time consume  more than 90 second Deductions 
1 Up to 3 Seconds 0.20 
2 Up to 5 Seconds 0.30 
3 Up to 9 Seconds 0.40 
4 Up to 10 Seconds or More 0.50 
 
 
 
 24 SECTION  3  
DIFFICULTY TABLE  
POLE MALLAKHAMB  
1. MOUNT  
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..  SSaaddhhii  UUddii  &&  iittss  vvaarriiaattiioonnss,,  
22..  NNaakkiikkaass  MMoouunntt,,  
33..    GGhhooddaa  mmoouunntt    
44..  oonnee  lleegg  ttaakkee  ooffff  
55..  KKhhaannddaa  MMoouunntt,,    
66..  BBaaggllii  TTeeddhhii,,  
77..  BBaaggllii  AAaaddhhii,,  11..  SSiiddee  BBaacckk  SSaallttoo  CCaattcchh,,  
22..  KKaassaavv  AAaaddhhii  MMoouunntt    
33..  GGhhooddaa  KKhhaallcchhii    
44..  KKhhaannddaa  MMoouunntt  --  ffrreeee  
55..  JJuummpp  ttoo  bbaajjrraannggii  hhoolldd  aatt  hheeaadd    
hhiigghhtt,,  
  66..  CCeelleeaarr  aarrmm  ppiitt  MMoouunntt..  11..  BBaacckk  SSaallttoo  --  BBaacckkwwaarrdd,,    
22..  FFoorreehheeaadd  MMoouunntt  --  SSttrraaiigghhtt  HHaannddss  
&&  BBooddyy,,    
33..  FFrroonntt  CCaattcchh,,    
44..  JJuummpp  ttoo  GGuurruu  PPaakkaadd  HHoolldd  aatt  HHeeaadd  
HHiigghhtt,,    
55..  KKaassaavv  PPaakkaadd  ½½  ttuurrnn  TTeeddhhii 
2. HOLD PART 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..  BBaajjaarraanngg  PPaakkaadd,,  
22..  HHaannuummaann  DDhhwwaajj,,    
33..  BBaannddaarr  PPaakkaadd,,  
44..  GGuurruu  PPaakkaadd,,    
55..    TTeeddhhii  NNaattaarraajjaassaann  --  wwiitthh  oouutteerr  
hhaanndd,,    
66..  BBaaggllii  PPhhaarraa,,    
77..  PPaasscchhiimmoottttaannaassaann,,    
88..  PPaaddaahhaassttaassaann,,    
99..  AAkkaarrnnaa--  DDhhnnuurraassaann,,    
1100  TTwwoo  HHaanndd  MMaayyuurraassaann,,  
1111..  NNaauukkaassaann,,  KKoooorrmmaassaann,,  
1122..  HHaattaacchhaa  PPhhaarraa,,    
1133  GGooddhhaa  BBaallaannccee    11..      CClleeaarr  AArrmmppiitt  SSuuppppoorrtt  ((  TT  ))    
  22..      OOnnee  lleegg  GGuurruuppaakkaadd,,    
  33..      SSttrraaddddllee  LL  HHoolldd,,    
  44..      EEkkppaaddsshhiirraassaann,,    
  55..      KKuukkkkuuttaassaann,,    
  66..      ½½  aarrmm  bbaallaannccee,,  
77..      TTeeddhhii  NNaattaarraajjaassaann--wwiitthh  iinnnneerr    
HHaanndd,,  HHaannuummaannttaassaann,,    
  88..        HHaassttaa  PPaaddaagguusstthhaassaann,,  
  99..      BBaaggllii  PPllaannkk,,    
  1100..    VVeeeerraabbhhaaddrraassaann,,    
1111..    PPaattiicchh  TTaajjaawwaa  ((BBaacckk  1122..  
BBaallaannccee)),,  
1122..    PPoottaacchhaa  TTaajjaawwaa  ((aabbddoommiinnaall  
BBaallaannccee)),,  
  1133..    HHaattaacchh  pphhaarraa--  HHoorriizzoonnttaall,,  
1144..    VVrriisscchhiikkaassaann  ffrroomm  bbaaggllii  HHoolldd,,    
1155..    VVrriisscchhiikkssaann  ffrroomm  hhaanndd  HHoolldd,,  
1166..    PPaayyaacchhaa  pphhaarraa  ((TTooee  BBaallaannccee)),,    
  1177..    BBaacckk  FFiisshh,,    
  1188..    SSiiddee  FFiisshh,,  SShhoouullddeerr  PPllaannkk..  11..  OOnnee  HHaanndd  SSttrraaddddllee  LL,,    
22..            ..                CChhaakkoorraassaann,,  
33..  NNaattaarraajjaassaann  HHaanndd--lleegg  hhoolldd,,    
44..  SSttaanndd  ttoo  NNaattaarraajjaassaann,,    
55..  DDuurrvvaassaann,,  SSttaannddiinngg  SSpplliitt,,  
66..  YY--LLeevveerr,,    
77..  KKaannddaappeeeeddaassaann,,    
88..  OOnnee  hhaanndd  BBaaggllii  PPllaannkk,,    
99..  FFuullll  aarrmm  bbaallaannccee,,    
1100..  VVrriisscchhiikkaassaann  ffrroomm    
1111..  SShhoorrttaarrmm,,  VVrriisscchhiikkaassaann  ffrroomm  
HHaanndd  SSttaanndd,,    
1122..  HHaanndd  ssttaanndd  PPllaannkk.. 
3. ACROBATIC ELEMENTS 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..  DDaassaarraanngg  ffrroomm  bbootthh  ssiiddeess,,  
22..  TTeeddhhii  VVeell,,    
33..    HHaanndd//LLeegg  PPhhiirraakkii,,    
44..  TTaabbaakk  PPhhaadd,,  
55..  GGuurruuppaakkaadd  PPhhiirrkkii,,    
66..  SSuuiiddoorraa  oonnee  lleegg,,    
77..  AAnnggssaaffaa..  11..  OOnnee  HHaanndd  DDaassaarraanngg  ffrroomm  bbootthh  
ssiiddeess,,    
22..  OOnnee  HHaanndd  TTeeddhhii  VVeell  MMaacchhaallii  
GGhhaannaa,,    
33..  TTaabbaakk  FFaadd  DDaassaarraanngg,,    
44..  AAnnggssaaffaa  TTwwiisstt  ttoo  AAaaddhhii,,  
55....  SShhiiddii  ((MMiinn..44  SStteeppss)),,  
66..  SSuuiiddoorraa  bbootthh  lleeggss,,  
77..  KKhhaannddii  SSuuiiddoorraa  ((MMoohhaannbbeeddii))    
77..  KKhhaannddii  DDaassaarraanngg  ttwwiiccee,,    
88..  BBaaggllii  PPhhaarraa  BBaacckk  bbaallaannccee,,    
99..  SShhoorrtt  AArrmm  ttoo  OOnnee  hhaanndd    
1100  MMaayyuurraassaann  &&  vviiccee  VVeerrssaa,,  
1111..  SShhoouullddeerr  PPllaannkk  ttoo  aabbddoommiinnaall  11  
1122..  ..                          ..                          BBaallaannccee  &&    VViiccee  VVeerrssaa,,    
1133..  BBeenntt  LLeegg  ttoo  HHaanndd  PPrreessss  ttoo  HHaanndd    
SSttaanndd,,    
1144..  BBaaggllii  BBaallaannccee  ttoo  GGhhooddaa  BBaallaannccee..  11..  FFrreeee  hhaanndd  DDaassaarraanngg,,    
22..  TTeellii  GGhhaannaa  11//11  ttuurrnn  ttoo  aaddhhii,,  
33..  OOnnee  HHaanndd  TTaabbaakkffaadd  DDaassrraanngg,,  
        44..  OOnnee  HHaanndd  SSttrraaddddllee  LL  ttoo  SShhoorrttaarrmm  
&&    VViiccee  VVeerrssaa,,    
55..  HHaannddssttaanndd  ttoo  SSttrraaddddllee,,  
66..  SSttrraaddddllee  LL--PPrreessss  ttoo  HHaannddssttaanndd,,    
  77..  HHaattaacchhaa  PPhhaarraa  ttoo        SShhoorrtt    AArrmm  
BBaallaannccee,,    
88..  SShhoorrtt  AArrmm  BBaallaannccee  ttoo    
99..  VVeeeerrbbhhaaddrraassaann..  
 25 4. CATCHES 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..  PPhhiirraakkii  CCaattcchh,,    
22..  HHaanndd  HHoolldd  CCaattcchh,,    
33..  BBaaiitthhii  ZZaaaapp  CCaattcchh,,    
  11..  BBaajjrraanngg  CCaattcchh,,    
22..  GGuurruuppaakkaadd  CCaattcchh,,    
33..  AAddhhii  ttoo  BBaajjrraanngg,,    
44..  BBaannddaarr  ttoo  SShhoouullddeerr  PPllaannkk,,  
55..  AAddhhii  ttoo  BBaannddaarr,,  
66..  SShhoorrttaarrmm  ttoo  CCaattcchh,,  
77..  MMaayyuurraassaann  CCaattcchh,,    
88..  SSqquuaatt  CCaattcchh,,  
99..  SSlliiddiinngg  CCaattcchh,,    
1100..  PPoottaacchh  TTaajjwwaa  CCaattcchh,,  
1111..  SShhoorrtt  AArrmm  ttoo  tteeddhhii,,  
1122..  HHaannuummaann  DDhhaawwjj  CCaattcchh  11..  AAddhhii  ttoo  AAddhhii,,    
22..  HHaannddssttaanndd  CCaattcchh,,    
33..  OOnnee    HHaanndd  MMaayyuurraassaann  CCaattcchh,,    
44..  KKhhaaddii  ZZaaaapp,,  
55..  ½½  ttuurrnn  KKhhaaddii  ZZaaaapp,,    
66..  OOnnee  HHaanndd  mmaayyuurraassaann  ttoo  TTeeddhhii,,  
77..  BBaajjrraanngg  ttoo  BBaajjrraanngg,,    
88..  CChhaakkoorraassaann  CCaattcchh,,    
  99..  VVeeeerrbbhhaaddrraassaann  SSttaannddiinngg½½  //  FFuullll  
ttuurrnn  CCaattcchh,,  
  1100..  HHaannuummaann  DDhhwwaajj  RReevveerrssee  
CCaattcchh    
5. DISMOUNTS 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..  BBiinnhhaattii  UUddii,,  
22..  MMaayyuurrpphhaannkkhhii,,    
33..  BBaannddaarr  uuddii,,  
44..  HHaattaacchhaa  PPhhaarraa  CCuutt,,  
55..  MMaayyuurraassaann  CCuutt..  11..  BBiinnhhaattii  UUddii  ½½  ttuurrnn,,  
22..  BBaannddaarr  UUddii  ½½  ttuurrnn,,    
33..  MMaayyuurrpphhaannkkhhii  ½½  ttuurrnn,,    
44..  SShhoorrtt  AArrmm  CCuutt,,    
55..  OOnnee  HHaanndd  MMaayyuurraassaann  CCuutt,,  
  66..  PPoottaacchhaa  TTaajjwwaa  kkaallaatt  //  ccuutt..  11..  BBiinnhhaattii  UUddii  FFuullll  TTuurrnn,,    
22..  BBiinn  hhaattii  UUddii  GGaaiinneerr  bbaacckk,,BBaacckk    
33..  FFrroonntt  SSaallttoo,,    
44..  MMaayyuurrpphhaannkkii  FFuullll  TTuurrnn,,    
55..  BBaannddaarr  GGaaiinneerr  BBaacckk,,  
66..  BBaajjrraanngg  FFrroonntt  //  BBaacckk  SSaallttoo,,  
GGaaiinneerr  BBaacckk,,  
77..  GGaaiinneerr  FFrroonntt  SSaallttoo,,    
88..  MMaayyuurraassaann  FFrroonntt    SSaallttoo,,  
  99..  HHaannddssttaanndd  PPuusshh  BBaacckk  SSaallttoo,,    
1100..  SSttrraaiigghhtt  hhaanndd  mmaayyuurraassaann  
KKaallaatt..  
 
 26 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 27  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 28          
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
        
  
 
 
 
 
 
 29           
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
    
  
 
 
 
 
 
 30        
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
          
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 31  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
       
  
 
   
 
 32        
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
       
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 33         
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
       
 
 
           
  
 
 
 
 
 
 34  
      
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 35  
       
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
       
  
 
 
 
 
 36  
 
    
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
          
  
 
 
 
 
 
 37  
        
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
  
 
 
 
 
 
      
 
 38           
 
 
 
      
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 39  
       
  
 
 
 
 
                  
 
    
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 40         
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 41 HANGING MALLAKHAMB  
1. MOUNT  
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..      SSaaddhhii  UUddii  &&  iittss  vvaarriiaattiioonnss            
22..      NNaakkiikkaass  MMoouunntt,,    
    33..    GGhhooddaa  MMoouunntt  wwiitthh  11  HHaanndd      
SSuuppppoorrtt,,  
44..      KKhhaallaacchhii  TTeeddhhii..  11..    FFrreeee  ccaattcchh  //  KKaannppaaddaadd,,    
22..    KKaassaavv  PPaakkaadd,,    
33..  CClleeaarr  GGhhooddaa    MMoouunntt  wwiitthhoouutt      
HHaanndd  SSuuppppoorrtt  ((OOnnee  //  BBootthh  LLeegg  
TTaakkee  ooffff  ))  11..    SSiiddee  BBaacckk  
22..    CClleeaarr  bbaacckk  SSaallttoo,,    
33..    KKaassaavv  PPaakkaadd  aabboovvee  HHeeaadd    
44..    HHiigghhtt,,  KKaappaall  AAddhhii  MMoouunntt,,  
55..    FFrroonntt  SSaallttoo  CCaattcchh,,    
66..    KKhhaannddii  TTeeddhhii..  
2. HOLD PART 
  ‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    BBaajjaarraanngg  ,,    
22..    BBaannddaarr  PPaakkaadd,,  
33..    GGuurruu  PPaakkaadd,,  
44..    NNaattaarraajjaassaann--wwiitthh  oouutteerr  hhaanndd  
55..    PPaasscchhiimmoottttaannaassaann  
66..    AAkkaarrnnaa  --  DDhhnnuurraassaann,,  
77..    KKoooorrmmaassaann,,  
88..    SSttrraaddddllee  LL  
99..    BBaaggllii  PPhhaarraa//BBaallaannccee  11..    NNaattaarraajjaassaann--wwiitthh  iinnnneerr  HHaanndd,,  
22..    HHaannuummaannttaassaann,,  
33..    BBaaggllii  PPllaannkk  BBootthh  hhaannddeedd,,  
44..    BBaaggaallii  OOnnee  HHaannddeedd,,    
55..    HHaanndd  HHoolldd,,  
66..    BBaacckk  FFiisshh  
,,77..    SShhoouullddeerr  PPllaannkk            11..    GGhhooddaa  BBaallaannccee  HHoolldd  
22..    GGhhooddaa  BBaallaannccee    PPllaannkk..  
 
3. ACROBATIC ELEMENTS 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    DDaassaarraanngg,,    
22..    TTeeddhhii  VVeell,,    
33..    HHaanndd  PPhhiirraakkii,,  
44..      lleegg  PPhhiirraakkii,,  
55..    TTaabbaakk  FFaadd,,  
66..    GGuurruu  PPaakkaadd  PPhhiirraakkii,,  
77..    AAnnggaassaaffaa,,  
88..    OOnnee  lleegg  SSuuiiddoorraa..  11..    OOnnee  HHaanndd  TTeeddhhii  VVeell,,    
22..    TTeellii  GGhhaannaa  TToo  TTeeddhhii,,  
33..    MMaacchhllii  GGhhaannaa  
44..    TTaabbaakk  FFaadd  DDaassrraanngg,,  
55..    SShhiiddii  CClliimmbb  ((44  SStteeppss)),,  
66..    BBootthh  LLeeggeedd  SSuuiiddoorraa  
77..    MMoohhaannbbeeddii..  11..    OOnnee  hhaanndd  DDaassrraanngg,,    
22..    OOnnee  HHaanndd  TTeeddhhii,,  
  33..    CClliimmbb  UUpp  WWiitthh  OOnnee  AArrmm  SSuuppppoorrtt  44  
SStteeppss  
  44..    TTeellii  GGhhaannaa  AAddhhii..  
 
4. CATCHES 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    BBaaggllii  PPhhaarraa  CCaattcchh,,  
  22..    MMoohhaann  bbeeddii  CCaattcchh..  11..    BBaajjrraanngg  CCaattcchh,,  
22..    GGuurruu  ppaakkaadd  CCaattcchh,,    
33..    BBaannddaarr  PPaakkaadd  CCaattcchh    
44..    BBaannddaarr  ttoo  SShhoouullddeerr  PPllaannkk..  11..    AAddhhii  ttoo  BBaajjrraanngg,,    
22..    HHaanndd  HHoolldd  ((CClleeaarr))  ttoo  CCaattcchh,,  
33..    AAddhhii  ttoo  BBaannddaarr    
44..    SShhoouullddeerr  PPllaannkk    ttoo  BBaannddaarr,,    
55..    BBaajjrraanngg  ttoo  BBaajjrraanngg..  
 
5. DISMOUNTS 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss    ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    BBiinnhhaattii  UUddii,,    
22..    MMaayyuurrppaannkkhhii,,    
33..    BBaannddaarr  PPaakkaadd  UUddii..  11..    BBiinnhhaattii  UUddii  ½½  ttuurrnn,,    
22..    BBaannddaarr  PPaakkaadd  ½½  TTuurrnn,,  
33..    MMaayyuurrppaannkkhhii  ½½  TTuurrnn,,    
44..    HHaanndd  HHoolldd  CCuutt..  11..    BBiinnhhaattii  UUddii  FFuullll  TTuurrnn  
22..  BBaannddaarr  PPaakkaadd  UUddii  FFuullll  TTuurrnn,,  
33..    MMaayyuurrppaannhhkkii  FFuullll  TTuurrnn  
44..    GGuurruu  PPaakkaadd  FFuullll  TTuurrnn  
  55..    ..                            BBaajjrraanngg  FFrroonntt  SSaallttoo//BBaacckk  SSaallttoo..  
 
 42 
 
 
 
 
 
 
      
  
 
 
 43  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
       
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 44  
       
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 45       
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 46 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 47          
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 48  
 
 
     
         
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 49  
ROPE MALLAKHAMB  
 
1. MOUNT  
 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    SSiimmppllee  CClliimmbb,,  
22..    JJuummpp  &&  CCaattcchh  
33..    JJuummpp  ttoo  SSttrraaddddllee  LL  HHoolldd..  11..    FFrreeee  CClliimmbb  44SStteeppss  LLeeggss  ppoossiittiioonn  ooppttiioonnaall,,  
22..    SShhiiddii  CClliimmbb  44  SStteeppss,,    
33..    VVeell  CClliimmbbiinngg  OOnnee  HHaanndd  SSuuppppoorrtt,,    
44..      JJuummpp  ttoo  ½½  TTuurrnn  SSttrraaddddllee  LL  11..    FFrroonntt  SSaallttoo  CCaattcchh,,    
22..    FFuullll  TTuurrnn  CCaattcchh  LLeeggss  ppoossiittiioonn    
            ooppttiioonnaall..  
 
2. HOLD PART 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    SSaaddhhii  UUddii,,    
22..    SShhiirrsshhaassaann,,    
33..    LLoowweerr  CCrroossss,,    
44..    UUppppeerr  CCrroossss,,  
  55..                                PPaasshhiimmoottttaannssaann,,  
66..    SSttrraaddddllee  LL,,    
77..    PPaaddaahhaassttaassaann..    11..        NNiisshhaannii,,    
  22..        DDwwiippaaddsshhiirraassaann,,    
  33..        NNaattaarraajjaassaann,,  
  44..        YY--LLeevveerr,,    
  55..        FFrroonntt  LLeevveerr,,    
  66..        PPaaddmmaassaann,,  
  77..        BBaajjrraanngg,,    
  88..        EEkkppaaddsshhiirraassaann,,    
  99..        WWaaddii,,  
  1100..    RRiicckkaabb,,    
  1111..    SSuuppttaattrriivviikkrraammaassaann,,  
  1122..    WWaagghhuull  UUddii,,    
  1133..    GGuurruuppaakkaadd,,    
  1144..    SSiiddee  PPllaannkk,,    
  1155..    SShhaavvaassaann,,  
  1166..    NNiiddrraassaann,,    
  1177..    FFrroonntt  FFiisshh,,  
  1188..    SShhaayyaannaassaann,,  
  1199..    FFrroonntt  BBaallaannccee,,    
  2200..    DDhhaannuurraassaann..  11..    NNeeeeddllee  SSccaallee,,    
22..    BBaacckk  FFiisshh,,    
33..    HHaanndd  HHoolldd  BBaallaannccee..  
..  
 
3. ACROBATIC ELEMENTS 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    WWeell  --  CClleeaarr..  11..    SShhiiddii  44  SStteeppss,,    
22..    DDiissllooccaattiioonn  //  IInnllooccaattiioonnss,,    
33..    AAnnggaassaaffaa  --  SSttrraaiigghhtt  LLeeggggeedd..  11..  GGrraanndd  CCiirrccllee  CClleeaarr..  
 
 
 
 
 
 50 4. CATCHES 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    PPaasshhiimmoottttaannaassaann  ttoo  SSaaddhhii  UUddii,,    
22..    UUppppeerr  CCrroossss  ttoo  SSaaddhhii  UUddii,,    
33..    SSiiddee  PPllaannkk  ttoo  LL  //  SSttrraaddddllee  LL....    11..    SSaaddhhii  UUddii  ttoo  lloowweerr  CCrroossss  &&  
VViiccee  VVeerrssaa,,    
22..    CClleeaarr  FFrreeee  TTuurrnn  ttoo  WWaaddii,,  
33..    SSiiddee  PPllaannkk  DDrroopp  ttoo  LL,,    
44..    PPaaddaahhaassttaassaann  CCaattcchh..  11..  UUppppeerr  CCrroossss  ttoo  LLoowweerr  CCrroossss,,  
22..    LLoowweerr  CCrroossss  BBaacckk  FFaallll  ttoo  BBaajjrraanngg,,  
      33..    LLoowweerr  CCrroossss  ttoo  WWaaddii//  RRiicckkaabb,,                
44..    SSaaddhhii  UUddii  ttoo  RRiikkaabb  //  BBaajjrraanngg,,    
      55..    WWaaddii  ttoo  BBaajjrraanngg  &&  VViiccee  VVeerrssaa,,    
  66..    TTuurrnn  BBaajjrraanngg,,  
  77..    WWaaddii  ttoo  RRiicckkaabb,,    
        88..    SSaaddhhii  UUddii  ttoo  WWaaddii,,LLoowweerr  CCrroossss              
    99..    CClleeaarr  FFrreeee  TTuurrnn  ttoo  RRiicckkaabb,,    
  1100..  NNiiddrraassaann  ttoo  RRiicckkaabb,,  
  1111..  AAnnggssaaffaa  CCuutt  CCaattcchh,,    
  1122..    GGuurruuppaakkaadd  CCuutt  CCaattcchh,,    
  1133..  NNiiddrraassaann  ttoo  WWaaddii  //  BBaajjrraanngg  
 
5. DISMOUNTS 
‘‘AA’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘BB’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  ‘‘CC’’  CCllaassss  EElleemmeennttss  
11..    MMaayyuurrppaannkkhhii,,    
22..    SSaaddhhii  UUddii  ttoo  DDiissmmoouunntt,,  
  33..    FFrroogg  JJuummpp..  11..    MMaauurriippaannkkhhii  ½½  TTuurrnn  
22..    GGuurruu  PPaakkaadd  DDiissmmoouunntt..  11..    MMaayyuurrppaannkkhhii  FFuullll  TTuurrnn  ddiissmmoouunntt,,  
22..  LLoowweerr  CCrroossss  BBaacckk  SSaallttoo,,    
33..    SSttrraaddddllee  BBaacckk  SSaallttoo,,  
33..  11  LLeegg  //  BBootthh  LLeegg  RRiicckkaabb  BBaacckk          SSaallttoo  //  ½½  TTuurrnn,,  
44..  BBaajjrraanngg    ½½  TTuurrnn,,  FFrroonntt  SSaallttoo..  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 51 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 52 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 53  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
         
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 54  
 
 
 
 
 
 
        
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 55 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
        
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 56       
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
      
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 57        
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
    
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 58 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 59      
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
       
  
 
 60 DIMENSIONS   OF MALLAKHAMB  (MM) 
POLE MALLAKHAMB (In MM) 
S. No. Height Senior Group Sub-Junior Group 
1 Above the Ground 2600-2800 2400-2600 
2 Under the Ground 800-900 700-800 
3 Neck Height 180-200 180-200 
4 Top Height 70 60 
5 Total Length 3400-3700 3100-3400 
6 Bottom Circumference 530-550 480-500 
7 Below Neck Circumference 300-350 300-350 
8 Neck Circumference 180-200 180-200 
9 Top Circumference 350 300 
   
  
 
 
 
 61 HANGING  MALLAKHAMB (In MM) 
S. No. Height Senior Group 
1 Height 1700-1900 
2 Neck Height 180-200 
3 Top Height 70 
4 Distance between Bottom and  Ground 650-700 
5 Height of the Structure 4600-4800 
6 Bottom circumference 450-500 
7 Neck circumference 180-200 
8 Below Neck circumference 250-300 
9.  Width of the structure 3600-3800 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 62 ROPE  MALLAKHAMB (In MM) 
 
S. No. Parameters Senior Group Sub-Junior Group 
1 Total Length 5000-5500 5000-5500 
2 Thickness 18-20 12-13 
3 Height of the Structure 5800-6000 5800-6000 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 63 FIXATION OF STRUCTURE OF ROPE AND HANGING 
MALLAKHAMB 
             
  
  
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 64 SECTION 4  
APPENDICES  
 
APPENDIX- “A” 
MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
JUDGE’S SCORE SHEET  
 
Competition:   (Team Championship),        (Apparatus Championship) ,      (All around Individual  Championship)    
  Sex: Male/Female        Age Group:   U/12,U/14/U18, A/18, Event………………………….. Date………………………….. 
  Venue  …………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………… 
S.No. Name  of  Player Chest 
No. Time 
(Sec) Chief 
Judge Judge 
1 Judge 
2 Judge 
3 Judge 
4 Average 
Score Deduction Final 
Score Rem. 
1             
2             
3             
4             
5             
6             
 
     Name                                    Sign.                                                    Name                                     Sign.  
   
 Chief Judge………………………………………………Time Keeper……………………....... 
Judge 1…………………………………………………     Scorer…………………………… 
Judge 2………………………………………………   Checked by ……………………… 
 Judge 3 ………………………………………………    Director of Competition……….......  
Judge 4 ………………………………………………  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 65  
APPENDIX-“B” 
 
MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
JUDGE’S SCORE SLIP  
COMPETITION  I   
 
Player’s Name…………………………………………………Age Group………....................................... 
Sex…………… State………………………… Date…………………… Event…………………………… 
Distribution  of 10 Marks Deduction  Awarded Point Final Score Remarks 
Difficulty     ( 3.40)    
        4 A-Class Element - (0.80) 
        5 B-Class Element - (2.00)  
        1 C-Class Element - (0.60)     
Execution      (4.80)     
Combination (1.60)     
Bonus   (0.20) 
                   O (Originality)   0.20     
Total Elements/Exercise performed     
 
  Judge Name…………………….. Judge No……………Judge Sig………………………Date……………. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 66 APPENDIX- “C” 
 
MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
JUDGE’S SCORE SLIP  
COMPETITION II & III  
  
   Player’s Name……………………………………Age Group……….............................................................. 
   Sex…………… State………… ……………….Date…………………Event………………………………. 
 
Distribution  of 10 Marks Deduction  Awarded Point Final Score Remarks 
Difficulty     ( 3.40)    
        1 A-Class Element - (0.20) 
        5 B-Class Element - (2.00)  
        2 C-Class Element - (1.20)     
Execution      (4.80)     
Combination (1.60)     
Bonous   (0.20) 
                   O (Originality)   0.20 
                        
Total Elements/Exercise performed     
   
Judge Name…………………….. Judge No……………Judge Sig………………………Date………………. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 67  
 
APPENDIX- “D” 
 
MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
JUDGES SCORE SHEET  
 
Pyramid Competition  
 
Name of 
state Teams Chief Judge Judge 1 Judge 2 Judge   3 Judge 4 Judge 5 Average 
Score Deduction Final  
Score 
          
          
          
          
          
          
          
          
 
 Name                                    Sign.                                             Name                                     Sign.  
Chief Judge………………………………………………      Time Keeper…………………………..  
Judge 1……………………………………………………      Scorer………………………………… 
Judge 2……………………………………………………      Checked by …………………………… 
Judge 3 ………………………………………………….         Director of Competition……………….. 
Judge 4 …………………………………………………… 
Judge 5……………………………………………………   
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 68  
 
APPENDIX- “E” 
 
MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
FINAL RESULTS  
 
MEN GROUP  
 
Name of Competition……………………………………………………..Venue………………….. 
 
State…………………………... From…………………to………………Age Group……………… 
 
S.N0. Name of Event Name of Player Position State Points Certificate 
Number 
1. Pole Mallakhamb  First    
   Second    
   Third    
.2 Rope Mallakhamb   First    
   Second    
   Third    
3 Hanging Mallakhamb   First    
   Second    
   Third    
4 Team Championship  First    
   Second    
   Third    
 
Prepared by- Name ……………….............. …………………. Signature………………………................... 
Checked By-Name………………………………………………Signature…………………………….......... 
Signature of  Competition Director……………………………Signature TCC……………………………. 
 
 
 
 
 69  
 
APPENDIX- “F” 
 
MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
FINAL RESULTS  
 
WOMEN GROUP  
 
Name of Competition……………………………………………………..Venue………………….. 
 
State…………………………... From……………to………………Age Group……………………. 
      
S.N0. Name of Event Name of Player Position State Points Certificate 
Number 
1. Pole Mallakhamb  First    
   Second    
   Third    
.2 Rope Mallakhamb   First    
   Second    
   Third    
4 Team Championship  First    
   Second    
   Third    
 
Prepared by- Name ……………….............. …………………. Signature………………………................... 
Checked By-Name………………………………………………Signature…………………………….......... 
Signature of  Competition Director……………………………Signature TCC……………………………. 
 
 
 
 
 
APPENDIX- “G” 
 
 70    MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
ALL ROUND INDIVIDUAL CHAMPIONSHIPS 
MEN AGE GROUPS  
 
Name of Competition……………………………………………………..Venue………………….. 
 
State…………………………... From………………………….to………………………………… 
 
Name of Players Age  group State Pole  Rope Hanging Total 
Points Position 
 U/12    ⅹ  First 
     ⅹ  Second 
     ⅹ  Third 
 U/14    ⅹ  First 
     ⅹ  Second 
     ⅹ  Third 
 U/18      First 
       Second 
       Third 
 A/18      First 
       Second 
       Third 
 
Prepared by- Name ……………….............. …………………. Signature………………………................... 
Checked By-Name………………………………………………Signature…………………………….......... 
Signature of  Competition Director……………………………Signature TCC……………………………. 
 
 
 71 APPENDIX- “H” 
 
MALLAKHAMB FEDERATION OF INDIA 
ALL ROUND INDIVIDUAL  CHAMPIONSHIPS 
WOMEN  AGE GROUPS  
 
Name of Competition…………………………………Venue…………………………. 
 
State…………………………...From…………………………to………………………  
 
Name of Players Age  group Name  of  
State Pole  Rope Total  Points Position 
 U/12     First 
      Second 
      Third 
 U/14     First 
      Second 
      Third 
 U/18     First 
      Second 
      Third 
 A/18     First 
      Second 
      Third 
 
Prepared by- Name ……………….............. …Signature………………………............................ 
Checked By Name……………………………  Signature............................................................... 
Signature of  Competition Director……………………...Signature TCC……………………… 
 